Table     of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nissan Affiliate To Expand U.S. 
Procurement of Auto Parts; Saison Group To Market Chrysler 
Automobiles in Japan 

   Economic Trends - NIES Studies Population Redistribution To 
Reduce Energy Consumption 

   Environmental Issues - NEDO To Develop High-Performance 
Industrial Furnaces, Boilers 

   Financial Issues - Japanese Banks Expanding Activity in Mexico; 
Measures on Nonperforming Assets Expected in Stimulus Package 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - BURMA:  Government Behind in Debt 
Payments to Japan; CHINA:  JGC To Enter Pharmaceutical Plant Design- 
Engineering Field; NEC To Begin Marketing Digital Mapping Systems 

   Governmental Affairs - Government Resumes ODA to Iran for Dam 
Construction 

   Insurance Industry - FEATURE:  MOF Continues To Criticize U.S. 
Position in Insurance Talks 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  MT Firms Emphasizing Foreign 
Manufacturing, Procurement; Nachi-Fujikoshi Records FY93 Current 
Losses of $35 Million; Toyoda Machine Works Receives Cam Grinder 
Order From Renault; Citizen Watch Furloughs MT Plant Workers Because 
of Poor Sales 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Fujitsu's VPP500 
Supercomputer Falls Short of Expectations; Tokyo Electron To Boost 
Overseas Procurement of Parts, Materials 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  Divergent Views Evident 
on Future Fiber Optic Network; MELCO, Raytheon To Develop Maritime 
Communications Systems; Mitsui, U.S. Firm Sign Communications 
Cooperation Agreement 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Macroeconomic Control Creates New 
Debt Problems for Enterprises; Pudong To Invest 15 Billion Yuan in 
Infrastructure in 1994; Nature of Guangxi's Economic Cooperation 
Reportedly Changing; Nanning Upgrades Transport Infrastructure 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Value of Most Agricultural 
Imports, Exports Decrease in 1993; Hong Kong Trade With Mainland 
Expected To Increase Again in 1994; Tianjin Signs Housing, Auto 
Contracts With Malaysian Firm; Tianjin Signs Two Construction 
Contracts With Hong Kong Firm; Tianjin Establishes Business Ties 
With ROK; Heilongjiang Establishes Joint Venture With Japan; 
Heilongjiang's Harbin Increases Foreign Investments; Liaoning 
Approves 404 Taiwan-Funded Investments in 1993; Shenyang Foreign 
Economic, Trade Achievements; Steel Industry Utilization of Foreign 
Capital in 1993; Jiangsu Joint Polyester Project With U.S., Japan; 
Oingdao Bonded Zone Attracts Foreign Investment of $63 Million; 
Foreign Investment in Fujian in 1993 Exceeds Last 14 Years; Taiwan 
Corporation Invests in Tianjin; Taiwan Invests in Shanghai 
Industrial Zone; Austrian Government Funds Guangxi Water Project 

   Taiwan:  Government Moves To Meet U.S. Tariff Demands; National 
CEPD Takes Steps To Facilitate Financial Liberalization; Singapore 
To Serve as Model for Financial Liberalization; Investment in 
Mainland Expected To Continue; Japanese Investment Decreased 35 
Percent in 1993; Investments in Southeast Asia Increase 40 Percent 
in 1993; Investment in PRC Goes Mainly to South But Shift Noted; 
Kuomintang To Reduce Its Party-Run Investments From Vietnam; New 
Guidelines on Investment in the PRC Take Effect 20 Jan; Export 
Orders in 1993 Increase 6.13 Percent; Hong Kong Up by 30 Percent; 
Foreign Trade Up by 5.5 Percent in 1993; Economics Minister on Steps 
To Increase Accession to GATT 

   NORTH KOREA:  Pyongyang Alcohol Plant Begins Soju Export 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  KOTRA Expanding, Increasing Support to 
ROK Exporters; FEATURE:  Press Reacts to U.S. Court Order Against 
Iljin; FEATURE:  ROK To Export Nuclear Equipment and Technology; 
FEATURE:  Firms Planning Major Drive into LCD Market; Business Laws 
Restricts Foreign Investment; Machine Toolmakers Report Increase in 
Orders; Increase in Export of Automobile Spare Parts Reported; Anam 
Electronics Projects Show Increase in Domestic Sales; Kyongin 
Promotes Globalization Strategy; Dongyang Exports Steel to Asian 
Markets; Hanil Plans To Build Textile Plant in China; Samik Musical 
Instruments To Expand Indonesian Plant; Hyundai To Install Crude 
Oil, Gas Production Equipment in India; Hansol Paper Company To 
Build Plant in Malaysia; Kia To Produce Car Equipment Jointly With 
Foreign Partners; Business Corporations Increasing U.S., Canadian 
Investment; Samsung To Build Oil Tankers for Greek Company; Pungsan 
To Supply Copper Pipes to Saudi Arabia; Hyundai Motors To Break 
Ground for Malaysian Plant 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Thai Firm To Build Dams, Roads, Port in 
Burma 

   INDONESIA:  New Incentives for Oil Exploration Announced; 
Transportation, Energy Budget for 1994-95 Reported; Ministry Issues 
Jakarta Minimum Wage Decree 

   MALAYSIA:  Joint Venture Company To Establish Third LNG Plant; 
Small, Medium-Size Industries To Acquire Russian Technology; Company 
Receives Orders for Amphibious Aircraft 

   LAOS:  Germany To Give Aid for Telecommunications, Agriculture 
Projects 

   PHILIPPINES:  Customs Computerizes Procedures at Ports, Airport; 
BOI Says 1993 Investments Below Target; Petrochemical Project 
Approved; Phone Pact With France Signed 

   SINGAPORE:  LPG Storage Terminal Established in PRC 

   THAILAND:  Government Reports Rise in Deficit; Plan To Build 
Power Plant in Rayong Announced; Firm Signs Telecommunications 
Agreement With Laos; Bank Reviews Trade Volume With Indochina; 
Increase in Investment Applications in 1993 Reported; Increase in 
Car, Parts Exports Noted 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investment Lagging in Central Vietnam; 
Manufacturers Reluctant To Invest in Equipment, Facilities; 'Record 
Turnover' for Hanoi's Industrial Sector Reported; Light Industry 
Export Figures for 1993 Reported; Contract Signed With Hong Kong To 
Build Commercial Center; Increase in 1993 Agricultural Output 
Reported; Joint Venture Producing Phone Cables; Hanoi Nonstate 
Economic Sector Registers Increase in 1993; Saigon, Haiphong Ports 
Improve Handling Capacity 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-03) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Nissan Affiliate To Expand U.S. 
Procurement of Auto Parts -- Kansei Corp., one of three auto parts 
manufacturers affiliated with Nissan Motor, is moving to expand its 
overseas procurement of parts and materials.  The company will 
increase overseas purchases from last year's 3.5 billion yen ($32 
million) to 4 billion yen ($36 million), of which Kansei will 
procure about 20 percent from Kantus Corp., its U.S. manufacturing 
subsidiary in Tennessee.  Given the Iiigh yen, Kansei is trying to 
find ways to lower production costs and increase profits. 

   Kansei will also try to expand procurement from other U.S. parts 
manufacturers.  On 23 January the company dispatched a group to the 
United States to survey parts manufacturers and to select parts for 
procurement. The survey group will visit about 20 U.S. producers of 
electronics parts, electronic substrates, and resins to search for 
suitable parts and materials.  Depending on orders placed during the 
survey, it is quite possible that Kansei will increase its overseas 
procurement "well beyond 4 billion yen." 

   Until 1992, the company's overseas purchases had been limited to 
a variety of resins.  But because of the high yen and increased 
product quality overseas, Kansei began purchasing other items, such 
as wire harnesses and crossing coils.  Kansei also purchases parts 
from the Philippines, Thailand, and Taiwan.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 24 Jan 94 p 10) 

   Saison Group To Market Chrysler Automobiles in Japan -- The 
Saison Group has revealed plans to market three of Chrysler Corp.'s 
new models in Japan.  Seibu Motor Sales, a subsidiary of the group, 
has reached agreement with Chrysler Japan Sales (CJS), a joint 
venture between Chrysler and Osawa Sales Co., which is also part of 
the Saison Group, to import and sell Chrysler vehicles through Seibu 
Motor Sales' 300 dealer outlets. 

   The Saison companies want to import three models that are 
referred to as "Japanese car-killers" because of their "high quality 
and low price."  The companies are already preparing to import the 
"Eagle Vision" as early as March, and are particularly interested in 
the "Neon," which has a low price of $8,975 (980,000 yen) and an 
engine larger than 2,000 cc.  However, regarding the Neon and 
another Chrysler model, the "Cirrus," CJS officials say they have 
not yet decided what action to take. 

   Osawa Sales Co. currently markets the Dodge "Viper" and Chrysler- 
made recreational vehicles (RVs).  Chrysler also has an arrangement 
with Honda Motor Co., which markets Chrysler RVs imported by CJS 
through 1,700 of its sales outlets.  Chrysler is also negotiating 
with Mitsubishi Motor Corp., "which has shown interest in selling 
Chrysler sedans."  (Tokyo NIKKEI RYUTSU SHIMBUN 25 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Economic Trends - NIES Studies Population Redistribution To 
Reduce Energy Consumption -- The Environment Agency's National 
Institute for Environmental Studies (NIES) has revealed that a 
regional redistribution of Japan's population could reduce energy 
consumption in the transportation sector by as much as 20 percent, 
according to a general simulation study it recently conducted.  The 
study was based on factors such as the long-distance transport of 
goods, intra-city and inter-city traffic, national land use, and 
global environmental issues.  As one example derived from the 
exercise, it was found that redistributing 30 percent of the 
population in Tokyo and Osaka metropolitan areas by shifting half 
the population in the Kanto and Kinki regions to the Chugoku and 
Shikoku regions would result in an optimum 20 percent reduction in 
energy consumption in the transportation sector, from 724 trillion 
kilocalories to 594 trillion kilocalories.  This reduction in turn 
would have a favorable impact on protecting the global environment. 

   The simulation study is part of a larger "international 
comparative study on the status of social economic systems for the 
purpose of protecting the global environment" currently being 
conducted by the NIES Global Environment Research Center.  Results 
from this larger study of cities worldwide reveal that an even 
distribution of "compact cities" requires less energy consumption by 
the transportation sector than a scattering of high-density cities, 
and that this is also favorable in terms of preventing global 
warming.  The NIES will pursue future comparative international 
studies and will examine target policies in light of its findings. 
(Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 21 Jan 94 p 7) 

   Environmental Issues - NEDO To Develop High-Performance 
Industrial Furnaces, Boilers -- The New Energy and Industrial 
Technology Development Organization (NEDO), which is affiliated with 
the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI), this year 
will initiate a project to develop high-performance industrial 
furnaces that consume 30 percent less energy and boilers which 
consume 5 percent less energy than current models.  The project will 
be subsidized by MITI at a cost of 25 billion yen ($227 million) 
over a period of 7 years.  Currently, industrial furnaces used for 
heating, heat treatment, and melting account for 5 percent of 
Japan's total energy consumption.  NEDO calculates that the use of 
new furnaces will result in national energy savings of 5 percent. 

   NEDO will study data from research on combustion in microgravity 
environments to develop ways of controlling the furnace flame to 
improve fuel efficiency and develop methods for reducing harmful 
emissions, which it will apply to the design of both furnaces and 
boilers.  It will consign the research on combustion and the work to 
develop furnace flame control technologies to the Japan Space 
Utilization Promotion Center and work with the Japan Microgravity 
Center's drop tower facility in Kamisunagawa-cho, Hokkaido, and 
Bremen University's drop tower in Germany.  It will also exchange 
research results and data with French researchers, who have been 
experimenting with aircraft in microgravity environments. 

   NEDO will consign the development of a trial furnace to the Japan 
Industrial Furnace Manufacturers Association and the development of 
a trial boiler to the Japan Society of Industrial Machinery 
Manufacturers.  It will then appraise the performance of the trial 
models.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 24 Jan 94 p 5) 

   Financial Issues - Japanese Banks Expanding Activity in Mexico -- 
Major commercial banks and long-term credit banks are intensifying 
business efforts in Mexico now that the North American Free Trade 
Agreement (NAFTA) has gone into effect, according to the 18 January 
NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU).  The idea is to gain a firm 
foothold in the Mexican market, where the mutual opening of the 
three NAFTA markets is expected to stimulate investment and where 
there is the greatest potential for growth.  The banks involved are 
Bank of Tokyo (BOT), Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan (LTCB), Fuji 
Bank, and Sakura Bank. 

   The BOT is currently considering establishing bases for operation 
in Mexico.  It appears to be considering two methods to achieve 
this:  setting up subsidiaries through its U.S. affiliates and 
increasing the number of its representative offices.  According to 
the 1 January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), it is also increasing 
its correspondent arrangements with local Mexican banks by 
commissioning them to represent BOT in conducting branch operations 
in Mexico.  In addition, according to the 24 December NIKKEI, BOT 
decided to enhance its cooperative relationship with the Mexican 
Development Bank (NAFIN).  It originally established the 
relationship in April 1990, but recently it expanded that 
cooperative activity to the U.S. by setting up an "information 
service" office in New York where it will conduct seminars on 
investing in Mexico for Japanese companies. 

   The LTCB concluded a business cooperation agreement with the 
government-run Foreign Trade Bank of Mexico in November 1993. 
According to the 23 November NIKKEI, LTCB believed the cooperation 
agreement would give it an advantage over other Japanese banks going 
into Mexico.  LTCB's objectives in signing the agreement, according 
to the NIKKEI KINYU, are to provide information on Japanese 
companies seeking to invest directly in Mexico, to exchange 
information about companies wanting to establish cooperative 
technological arrangements and to assist Japanese companies trying 
to penetrate the Mexican market. 

   The NIKKEI KINYU reports that Fuji Bank's wholly-owned financial 
subsidiary, Heller Financial, located in Chicago, established a 
factoring company (a financial institution to purchase accounts 
receivable) in Mexico City.  According to the 15 October NIKKEI, 
"Heller Mexico" is expected to begin operations early this year.  It 
will purchase domestic and U.S. accounts receivable from Mexican 
manufacturers of automobile parts, foodstuffs, and textiles.  The 
factoring market in Mexico was worth roughly $20 billion in 1992 and 
is expected to expand as Japanese anal U.S.-owned manufacturing 
companies hoping to export to U.S. and Canada in the wake of NAFTA 
set up bases of operations there.  "Heller Mexico" will also lease 
factory facilities and aims to solicit new business from Japanese 
companies going into Mexico by cooperating with Fuji Bank's Japanese 
branches. 

   Sakura is one of the banks expanding the types of credit it 
offers in Mexico.  Previously its range of credit was restricted to 
credit for trading purposes only, but now Sakura will finance any 
type of company going into Mexico when a guarantee is provided by 
the Japanese or U.S. parent company. 

Foreign banks have been virtually excluded from the Mexican 
market, according to a 5 January NIKKEI KINYU article.  (Presently 
Citibank is the only foreign bank with an authorized branch there.) 
The article reports that limits on foreign ownership of Mexican 
banks may gradually be lifted, but the Mexican government will 
retain the right to exercise "safeguards" on stock ownership until 
2004.  Nevertheless, since Mexican President Salinas' visit to Japan 
late in December 1993 and in anticipation of NAFTA taking effect, 
the 28 December NIKKEI reports, penetration of the Mexican market by 
major Japanese, U.S., and Canadian banks has become a central topic 
of discussion.  A statement made by Mexican Secretary of Finance and 
Public Credit Aspe to the Mexican congress in particular sparked 
some speculation.  The article cites him as saying he foresaw 
"between 20 and 25 foreign banks establishing subsidiaries in Mexico 
as the financial market is liberalized in 1994."  The BOT and LTCB 
were discussed as being among those Japanese banks to be chosen. 

   Measures on Nonperforming Assets Expected in Stimulus Package -- 
The Ministry of Finance (MOF) is considering a new four-part plan to 
help private financial institutions expedite the disposal of 
nonperforming assets, according to the 25 January NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The paper summarizes the four points as follows: 
1) The MOF will create a framework to sell off nonperforming assets, 
particularly those held by nonbanks and housing loan corporations 
for which interest has been reduced or cancelled--including the 
establishment of a new company to purchase such loans;  2) the MOF 
will offer information on a systematic basis concerning 
collateralized real estate held by the Cooperative Credit Purchasing 
Corporation (CCPC) and financial institutions to national and local 
governments; 3) it will encourage financial institutions to issue 
preferred stock; and 4) it will be more flexible regarding disposal 
of nonperforming assets through taxable reserve accounts. 

   The first measure is expected to be finalized by an advisory 
group established by MOF's Banking Bureau in the spring of 1994. 
Previously, banks could not write off reduced or cancelled interest 
assets--loans made to nonbanks and housing lenders on which interest 
has been drastically reduced or even cancelled altogether as part of 
a "life-support policy" --unless that support plan had ceased. 
Under the new policy, banks would be able to sell the assets and 
write off the loss on the sale without being taxed once the extent 
of the support plan is clear.  It is believed that this measure will 
obviate the need to change restructuring plans currently in effect 
for the housing loan companies and nonbanks.  The MOF is considering 
a proposal to establish a company to purchase such assets, although 
there is some discussion about having the CGPC undertake this task. 

   Second, the National Land Agency has established a council to 
furnish information on collateralized real estate owned by financial 
institutions and the CCPC to national and local governmental organs. 
NIKKEI reports that governmental organizations were previously 
unaware of such real estate. The council's establishment thus will 
facilitate quicker real estate sales. 

   Third, the objective of encouraging banks to issue preferred 
stock is designed to allow them to maintain their net worth while 
writing off large amounts of nonperforming assets.  Currently only 
one major commercial bank is considering this step, but the MOF is 
calling on other financial institutions to take this step, NIKKEI 
observes. 

   Finally, the MOF is being "more flexible" with respect to taxable 
reserve accounts, according to the 21 January NIKKEI.  It is 
relaxing the standards applicable to reserve accounts for writing 
off specially designated assets.  Banks have always set aside 
reserves for assets determined by law to have gone bad due to 
bankruptcies, or for uncollateralized assets of companies that have 
been insolvent for a long period.  Now a bank will be able to set 
aside a reserve for a broader range of assets.  When it has 
determined that an asset for which interest has been not only 
delayed (longer than six months) but also reduced or even completely 
omitted, and deems that the asset is irretrievable, the bank can set 
aside reserves in a contingency account.  It must then report that 
it has done so to the MOF. 

   In the past the MOF has been cautious about authorizing the 
taxable accumulation of reserves so as not to highlight the 
differences in banks' health, since stronger banks are able to set 
aside larger reserves.   Previously it has been customary for banks 
to coordinate when they were going to accumulate reserves for a 
common borrower.  However, this has resulted in weaker banks being 
unable to accumulate large reserves, thereby slowing the write-off 
process.  Now a bank will be allowed to use its own judgment as to 
when it should accumulate the taxable- reserves.  The relaxed 
standard is expected to be included in the economic stimulus 
package, so that banks will be allowed to employ it in drawing up 
their March 1994 yearend financial statements for FY93. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - BURMA:  Government Behind in Debt 
Payments to Japan -- The Burmese government announced that it is in 
arrears on the repayment of its debt to Japan by 80 billion yen 
(US$727 million).  According to sources, Burma's late payments on 
its debt can be broken down into two parts.  Approximately 70 
billion yen (US$636 million) is for a yen loan through the Overseas 
Economic Cooperation Fund, and approximately 13 billion yen (US$118 
million) is for trade insurance issued through the Ministry for 
International Trade and Industry (MITI).  The loan and the trade 
insurance were borrowed for a petrochemical plant planned by the 
Myanmar Oil and Gas Enterprise and companies under the jurisdiction 
of the Energy Ministry.  MITI has already paid the insurance money 
to the Japanese creditors. 

   Burma paid back approximately 4 billion yen (US$36 million) in 
1991 and again in 1992.  With the Burmese economy looking up 
slightly in 1993, Burma paid back around 6 billion yen (US$54 
million), but this barely put a dent in the yen loan, which 
concerned sources estimate to be as much as 400 billion yen (US$3.63 
billion).  Although Burma has accepted foreign direct investment, 
its export industries, which earn foreign currency, are not yet 
fully developed, and this shortage of foreign currency is causing 
the late payments on Burma's debt to increase.  In an effort to 
acquire more foreign currency, Burma has sold petroleum and natural 
gas concessions to foreign enterprises.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
22 Jan 93 Evening Edition p 1) 

   CHINA:  JGC To Enter Pharmaceutical Plant Design-Engineering 
Field -- JGC Corp., a major petrochemical plant engineering firm, 
will cooperate with the Shanghai Pharmaceutical Design Institute to 
jointly undertake design and engineering work for pharmaceutical 
plants planned to be built in China by Japanese and European drug 
companies.  This will be JGC's first cooperative venture outside the 
field of petroleum and petrochemical plants.  The company, which 
already has three contracts to build drug plants in China, plans to 
use the venture to gather information on trends in China concerning 
drug approval procedures and product demand and distribution. 

   JGC will sponsor two employees from the Shanghai Pharmaceutical 
Design Institute for about six months of training.  The institute is 
China's largest designer and builder of pharmaceutical plants.  It 
performed design work for Ciba Geigy and has good contacts with 
"sources of foreign capital."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Jan 94 
p 3) 

   NEC To Begin Marketing Digital Mapping Systems -- NEC, Japan's 
largest manufacturer of PC's, will begin marketing digital mapping 
systems in China for the management of roads and water systems.  The 
mapping system consists of mapping information management software, 
Mapview, and Sun Microsystems system software to run on a NEC 
EWS4800 workstation.  NEC will sell the mapping software through 
Keligao Co., a Beijing-based software company, for $14,000 a copy. 
NEC has sold about 500 of these systems in Japan. 

   With China's rapid urban development, the company expects to sell 
about 100 systems annually.   Keligao will be responsible for sales 
in the China market and will also develop Chinese-language 
applications software for specific tasks.  NEC already sells library 
management systems software in China for use in workstations. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Jan 94 p 13) 

   Governmental Affairs - Government Resumes ODA to Iran for Dam 
Construction -- Japan has announced its intention to resume official 
development assistance (ODA) to Iran after an 18-year suspension. 
Although the ODA will finance construction of the fourth Karun dam, 
Japan is cautioning Iran that it could halt ODA "at any time."  This 
caution reflects Japan's awareness of the United States' desire to 
isolate Iran as a country that supports terrorism and to have other 
Western countries refrain from providing ODA to Iran.  Japan, on the 
other hand, is asserting a degree of "independence," stating that 
"supporting the Rafsanjani government, which is adopting pragmatic 
policies, will lead to stability not only in Iran but in the entire 
Persian Gulf region."  From the government's perspective, Iran will 
not change its attitudes toward the West even if it is isolated. 

   Another reason for Japan's cautious position is that it wants to 
keep Iran's sensitivities focused on Japan's "four principles of 
ODA," one of which prohibits Japan from extending ODA to a country 
which builds up its arms capabilities while receiving ODA.  Recently 
a rumor has circulated that Iran may buy "Nodong I" missiles from 
North Korea.  Japanese Ambassador to Iran Takeshi Ohara states that 
Japan has conveyed its concern to Iran over this rumor, and Iran has 
"officially denied this rumor."  Ohara further says that Japan will 
continue examining the provision of ODA to Iran with the four 
principles in mind. 

   Japan's ODA will help finance Iran's fourth Karun dam, which is 
estimated to cost 220 billion yen ($2 billion), of which Iran will 
pay 70 billion yen ($636 million).  Japan is expected to finance its 
150 billion yen ($1.36 billion) package in three installments. 
While Japan has announced its intention to extend a first 
installment totaling 38.6 billion yen ($351 million), it has 
"neither publicly announced nor notified Iran"  that it also will 
provide the second and third installments   (Tokyo ASAHI SHIMBUN 5 
Jan 94 p 8) 

   Insurance Industry - FEATURE:  MOF Continues To Criticize U.S. 
Position in Insurance Talks -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of Finance 
(MOF) remains critical of the U.S. Government position concerning 
the insurance industry in the Japan-U.S. framework talks and expects 
the talks to "remain extremely difficult, with the possibility of a 
breakdown," according to press reports.  Japan's life and non-life 
insurance sectors, which had been quiet concerning the negotiations, 
have begun openly criticizing the U.S. side and campaigning to win 
public support for their stands. 

   The MOF remains critical of the U.S. position on insurance issues 
in the Japan-U.S. framework talks, according to the 19 January NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  A senior MOF official, quoted by the 
paper, stated that "Japan cannot compromise in one-sided, 
unreasonable, and unfair talks."  In a similar vein, the 27 January 
MAINICHI SHIMBUN reports that the MOF strongly opposes setting up 
any "objective criteria" regarding a foreign share of the industry 
market, claiming that "objective criteria will inevitably end up 
becoming numerical targets."  A senior MOF official, quoted by 
MAINICHI, states that "the United States is selfish in asking Japan 
to exempt the "third area" of Japan's insurance market where a few 
U.S. insurers hold most of the market share, from liberalization." 
The "third area" refers to accident, sickness, nursing care, and 
other specialized personal insurance coverage. 

   MOF officials expect the talks to "remain extremely difficult, 
with the possiblity of a breakdown," according to the 19 January 
NIKKEI.  Many MOF officials "want to avoid the pattern of being 
forced to compromise in the end," as in previous Japan-U.S. 
negotiations, NIKKEI reports.  Some MOF officials hold an even 
tougher view that "a compromise would be rather harmful to future 
bilateral relations," the article notes. 

   The MOF still doubts the insurance sector has to be "an area for 
negotiations," according to the 19 January NIKKEI.  In the 
ministry's view, the U.S. insurance market is "more closed" than the 
Japanese market.  According to OECD statistics, the foreign shares 
in the Japanese and U.S. insurance markets in 1990 were 2.7 percent 
and 0.9 percent respectively; and Japan had $420 million in "net 
imports" from the U.S. insurance sector in 1990. 

   Insurance Industry Goes on the Offensive - Japan's life and non- 
life insurance industries, which had been quietly watching the 
governmental negotiations, have begun "openly criticizing the U.S. 
side," according to the 21 January MAINICHI.  Insurance industry 
leaders have become outspoken, criticizing the U.S. side in 
asserting that "the U.S. market is more closed than the Japanese 
market" and "the United States is asking Japan to adopt managed 
trade while it is advocating free trade," MAINICHI reports.  The 
article also observes that "some industry officials" have made even 
tougher remarks, such as "we are ready to fight the United States to 
the end." 

   Both industry sectors have begun campaigning to win public 
support for their position, according to the 21 January MAINICHI. 
Both have issued statements of their views, and industry leaders 
have held press conferences.  MAINICHI notes that this stems from 
the fact that the insurance sectors have recently realized that 
"they cannot completely leave this matter to the MOF" and that they 
must also speak out on their positions to win public support. 
According to the article, the insurance sectors "were not familiar 
with trade friction concerning the United States" and thus initially 
left the negotiations entirely to the MOF. 

   According to the 21 January NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, Takashi Onoda, 
chairman of Japan's Marine and Fire Insurance Association and 
president of Sumitomo Marine and Fire Insurance Co., on 20 January 
released a statement regarding the Japan-U.S. insurance talks.  It 
criticizes the U.S. position, claiming that the Japanese insurance 
market is more open than the U.S. market, where each state regulates 
insurance businesses with different-.-and often discriminatory- 
-regulations.  The statement further criticizes the U.S. proposal to 
delay liberalization of the "third area" as contradicting the U.S. 
position urging deregulation.  Further, the statement notes that the 
U.S. proposal to set numerical targets is "inappropriate," since it 
is the customer who decides which insurance policy to buy, and 
therefore the government "would not be able to achieve numerical 
targets even if they were adopted." 

   Toshiomi Urakami, chairman of the Life Insurance Association of 
Japan and president of Sumitomo Life Insurance, held a press 
conference on 21 January and criticized the U.S. Government for not 
"understanding the Japanese insurance market correctly," rebutting 
the U.S. claim that the Japanese market is closed, according to the 
24 January NIKKEI KINYU.  Urakami claimed that the Japanese life 
insurance market is "sufficiently open."  Concerning the U.S. 
proposal to set numerical targets, he stated that market shares 
result from the efforts of insurers and the choices of customers. 
"which the government cannot control." 

   Reasons for Deadlocked Bilateral Negotiations - In the 11 January 
SANKEI SHIMBUN, Washington correspondent Seiji Yajima points out 
that one reason for deadlock in the insurance talks is that neither 
government will compromise on their "principles."  According to 
Yajima, the U.S. side is sticking to its principle of attaining 
"results."  He notes that based on its experience of trade 
negotiations with Japan over 20 years, the U.S. Government has 
concluded that past trade agreements have not produced any concrete 
results, except in the semiconductor field.  Therefore, Yajima 
maintains, the U.S. Government will not abandon its "results- 
oriented approach."  Similarly, the Japanese side is adhering to its 
principle of "rejecting numerical targets."  The Japanese side is 
determined to "absolutely reject numerical targets themselves, 
anything similar to numerical targets, anything that may result in 
numerical targets, and all such things" as elements that do not 
belong in a free market economy, Yajima observes. 

   Another reason for deadlock, pointed out by the MOF, is that the 
U.S. agency in charge of insurance talks is the USTR, according to 
the 19 January NIKKEI.  A senior MOF official quoted in the article 
states that "USTR officials in charge of the negotiations lack an 
understanding of the insurance sector, which makes it impossible for 
us to conduct discussions based on the actual state of the insurance 
sector."  One example cited by the senior official is that USTR 
officials "were not aware that the brokerage system, which the 
United States is asking Japan to introduce, is not available in 12 
states in the United States."  As another example, USTR officials 
reportedly did not know that "New York and some other states have 
discriminatory regulations, such as requiring foreign insurers to 
place assets in trust equivalent to reserve funds for liabilities." 

   In addition, MOF officials are critical of reference materials 
prepared by USTR, according to Yoichi Funabashi, chief of ASAHI 
SHIMBUN's America Bureau.  Writing in the 27 January ASAHI, 
Funabashi reports that the atmosphere during a negotiating session 
"stiffened" after a senior MOF official, who once lectured at 
Harvard, pointed out "problems" in the U.S. reference materials and 
reportedly told the U.S. negotiators that "if I were a Harvard 
professor, I could not give this paper anything higher than a 'C'." 
An official in the MOF's International Finance Bureau also 
criticized the foreign market share figures for the G-7 countries 
presented by the U.S. side as "groundless and inappropriate for use 
in negotiations," the 27 January MAINICHI reports. 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - FEATURE:  MT Firms Emphasizing Foreign 
Manufacturing, Procurement -- SUMMARY:  Japanese machine tool (MT) 
manufacturers are beginning to increase foreign production and 
procurement to reduce costs and are emphasizing foreign sales 
because of the slump in the domestic market, according to press 
reports.  MT companies whose efforts have been reported in these 
areas include Koyo Kikai Kogyo, Sodick, and Ikegai. 

   Koyo Kikai Kogyo--According to the 28 January NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, Koyo Kikai Kogyo, a wholly owned subsidiary of the bearing 
manufacturing firm Koyo Seiko, has reached agreement with Wuxi 
Machine Tool Co. to form a joint venture (JV) company to assemble 
centerless grinding machines in Wuxi City, Jiangsu Province, China. 
The two companies are the largest manufacturers of centerless 
grinding machines in their respective markets; Koyo Kikai has a 33 
percent share of the Japanese market, and Wuxi Machine Tool holds a 
70 percent share of the Chinese market. 

   The JV company, Wuxi Koyo Machine Tool Co., will be established 
in March 1994 and will be capitalized at $2.1 million, with Koyo 
Kikai investing 51 percent and Wuxi Machine Tool 49 percent.  The JV 
firm will have 30 employees by September, when it will begin 
assembling Koyo Kikai's KC200 centerless grinders.  Initially all 
parts will be shipped from Japan, but in five years the local parts 
procurement ratio should rise to 60 percent.  Also, by that time the 
JV is expected to have 90 employees and should be producing about 
$20 million worth of centerless grinders annually.  This is the 
first Sino-Japanese joint venture that involves technical 
cooperation and the production of machine tools.  Fanuc's JV 
production of numerical control equipment in Beijing is said to 
involve only technical cooperation, NIKKEI SANGYO notes. 
   Sodick--According to the 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, Sodick 
Co., a major manufacturer of electrical discharge machines (EDM), 
will establish a corporation in Singapore in February to sell and 
service numerically controlled EDMs and procure electrical and 
machine tool parts.  The company will be capitalized at the 
equivalent of 6.8 million yen ($61,800).  The 24 January NIKKEI 
SANGYO reports that Sodick will use the Singapore company to build a 
network of subcontractors in Southeast Asia from which it can buy 
heavy cast parts, such as bases and frames.  Sodick hopes to reduce 
its manufacturing costs by about 10 percent by increasing its ratio 
of foreign parts procurement to "nearly 10 percent." 

   The 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO also reports that Sodick will 
consolidate its domestic production of numerically controlled EDMs 
at its main plant in Kaga City, Ishikawa Prefecture, and will shut 
down its Kanazawa plant, located in Matsuto City in Ishikawa. 
NIKKEI SANGYO adds that Sodick has already closed its Takaoka plant 
in Toyama Prefecture and its Morioka plant in Iwate Prefecture, and 
has solicited "voluntary" retirements from among its workers. 

   Ikegai--According to the 27 January NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, Ikegai 
Corp., a medium-size MT manufacturer specializing in numerically 
controlled lathes, is reorganizing its export structure to expand 
sales to China and Southeast Asia.  Ikegai will create a foreign 
trade division within its sales subsidiary, Ikegai Machine Sales, 
and will integrate sales of MT equipment and plastic injection 
molding equipment.  Ikegai will also open an office in Beijing, and 
is considering opening offices in Hong Kong and Singapore.  The 
Beijing office will be responsible for the inspection and 
maintenance of lathes exported to China, and initially will use 
technicians on loan from an unidentified Chinese MT trading company. 
Ikegai decided to raise its export ratio from "under 10 percent to 
over 20 percent" because "there is little hope for a major recovery 
in domestic demand," NIKKEI SANGYO adds. 

   Nachi-Fujikoshi Records FY93 Current Losses of $35 Million -- 
Nachi-Fujikoshi, Japan's largest cutting-tool manufacturer, recorded 
sales of 112.48 billion yen ($1.02 billion) during the company's 
1993 fiscal year, which ended in November.  This was a drop of 15.1 
percent from 1992.  The company's current losses were 3.85 billion 
yen ($35 million), and net income after taxes came to a minus 6.453 
billion yen ($58.66 million).  By taking 7.426 billion yen ($67.5 
million) in extraordinary losses, Nachi-Fujikoshi will eliminate its 
"financial engineering" problems.  The company's FY93 sales by 
corporate divisions is as follows: 


Division            Sales           Sales         Change from FY92 
                    (billion yen)  (million $) 

Cutting tools        22.229         $202.1        - 17.0 percent 
Bearings             41.472         $377.0        -  7.7 
Machine tools        20.33          $184.8        - 29.1 
Hydraulic equipment  17.357         $157.79       - 11.8 
Steel products       11.089         $100.8        - 10.7 

Total               112.477        1,022.49       - 15.1 % 



   The company's FY94 sales are expected to decline a further 4 
percent to 108 billion ($981.8 million), while net income after 
taxes should total 100 million yen ($909,100).  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 28 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Toyoda Machine Works Receives Cam Grinder Order From Renault -- 
Toyoda Machine Works (TMW), a machine tool company belonging to the 
Toyota Motor Group, has received a 800 million yen ($7.27 million) 
order from the French automaker Renault for 14 GWC-type 32-bit 
computer numerically controlled (CNC) masterless cam grinders.  This 
order reflects TMW's efforts to increase sales overseas because 
"domestic orders are being squeezed."  Seven grinders will be 
delivered in the fall of 1994, but a delivery date for the remainder 
has not been set. 

   While TMW has sold 73 of these grinders to Ford, this is the 
largest order from a European manufacturer.  Previously TMW sold 
three grinders to a Norwegian company, one in 1989 and two in 1990. 
(Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 14 Jan 94 p 1) 

   Citizen Watch Furloughs MT Plant Workers Because of Poor Sales -- 
Citizen Watch Co., which manufactures machine tools (MT) and 
industrial robots in addition to watches and automation equipment, 
furloughed all 320 workers at its precision machinery plant in 
Tokorozawa, Saitama Prefecture, for two days in January because of 
slumping sales.  The plant manufactures the company's MT products 
and robots.  Citizen furloughed half the workers on 20-21 January 
and the other half on 27-28 January. 

   This is the first time Citizen has furloughed its workers.  The 
firm is also considering reduction of its workforce over 10 years 
from the current 3,000 to 2,000 workers through normal attrition. 
(Tokyo MAINICHI SHIMBUN 29 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - FEATURE:  Fujitsu's VPP500 
Supercomputer Falls Short of Expectations -- SUMMARY:  Fujitsu has 
received only seven orders for its VPP500-series supercomputer since 
its introduction in late 1992, according to press reports.  All 
domestic orders were from public-sector institutions, and only one 
machine was sold overseas.  Despite claims of technological 
superiority, press reports indicate that Fujitsu may have won these 
bids in large part by extremely low bidding.  Fujitsu also failed to 
win several recent bids where existing Fujitsu supercomputers were 
in place. 

   Background to Development of Fujitsu's VPP500 - In September 
1992, Fujitsu Ltd. announced the development of its VPP500, a hybrid 
vector-parallel processing supercomputer.  Built in response to the 
scientific community's need for faster processing speeds, the VPP500 
is  the successor to the firm's VP and VPX series, according to the 
11 September 1992 NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  Fujitsu believed that 
demand for the VPP500 would be strong in the fields of space 
engineering and the natural sciences, such as atmospheric and 
environmental analysis, the 10 September 1992 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI) reports.  The company claimed the VPP500 was "the world's 
fastest" supercomputer, citing three key features to support its 
claim, according to the 11 September 1992 NIKKAN KOGYO: 

   1--The VPP500 carries VP-series vector processors made with 
highly integrated gallium arsenide (GaAs) large-scale integrated 
circuits (LSIs), which reportedly allow for higher speeds and more 
density than conventional silicon LSIs. 

   2--The VPP500 utilizes a "vector-parallel architecture" in which 
the vector processing units are linked in a parallel, or "crossbar" 
fashion, for faster processing.  A maximum of 222 processors can be 
linked in this way, each having a processing capability of 1.6 
billion floating point operations per second (1.6 gigaflops). 
Fujitsu claims that when the VPP500 is loaded with all 222 
processors, it can achieve a 355-gigaflop level. 

   3--The VPP500 carries a Fortran compiler tailored for parallel 
processing programming and recompilation software that allows it to 
run existing VP/VPX software.  The operating software uses 
"UXP/VPP," which is based on UNIX SVR4 and makes possible "parallel 
distributed processing." 

   Breakdown of Fujitsu's Seven VPP500 Orders - According to the 5 
October 1992 NIKKEI COMPUTER, Fujitsu won its first order for a 
VPP500 from the National Aerospace Laboratory (NAL), which falls 
under the Science and Technology Agency (STA), "soon after" the 
supercomputer's introduction in 1992.  The unit was procured as part 
of a joint project between NAL and Fujitsu that began in 1989 to 
develop a new "numerical wind tunnel" system, the 15 March 1993 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN reports.  The NAL also had a Fujitsu 
VP2600/10, according to the 28 April 1990 NIKKEI, so it is unclear 
whether the VPP500 is an upgrade or a separate unit. 

   On 24 June 1993 Fujitsu won its only overseas order for a VPP500 
from the University of Aachen in Germany, according to the 25 June 
1993 NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN.  The order was for a VPP500/4--four 
vector units with a capability of 6.4 gigaflops--at a lease price of 
30 million yen ($270,000) per month.  The university was already 
using a Fujitsu-made VP2600/20, but it decided to order the new 
machine to expand its capabilities.  Further, in mid-1994 the 
university plans to increase the number of processors from four to 
around 20.  The order will be filled via Siemens-Nixdorf Co., which 
produces the processors for Fujitsu on an OEM basis. 

   Fujitsu won its next domestic order on 2 July 1993, when the 
Institute of Space and Astronomical Science (ISAS) under the 
Ministry of Education selected a VPP500/7, according to the 3 July 
1993 NIKKAN KOGYO.  This order was among the four supercomputers 
purchased by the government under the FY93 regular budget.  ISAS was 
already using a Fujitsu VP-series supercomputer and decided to 
purchase a VPP500 because it could be connected with the older model 
and use the same software.  No price information was reported. 

   Fujitsu won four more orders for the VPP500 from government- 
related organizations with funds appropriated in the first 
supplemental budget of FY93.  According to the 30 November 1993 
NIKKEI, on 25 November Tsukuba University's Computer Center chose a 
VPP500 over an NEC-made SX-3R and a Cray C90 machine sponsored by 
Canon Supercomputer S.I. at a purchase price "around" 2 billion yen 
($18 million).  Tsukuba is a national university under the 
administration of the Ministry of Education.  Fujitsu's second order 
came on 30 November when the Communications Research Laboratories 
(CRL) of the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT) chose a 
VPP500 supercomputer over those offered by NEC, Cray Japan, and 
Hitachi, according to the 1 December 1993 NIKKEI.  CRL already has a 
Fujitsu supercomputer.  The winning bid was 540 million yen ($4.9 
million). 

   On 1 December 1993 Fujitsu won its third consecutive bid when the 
Angstrom Technology Partnership (ATP) announced that Fujitsu had won 
the bid over eight other competitors, according to the 2 December 
1193 NIKKEI SANGYO.  Fujitsu will supply its VPP500 combined with a 
CM-5 parallel processing supercomputer from the U.S. firm Thinking 
Machines at a price of 2.8 billion yen ($25.5 million).  According 
to the March 1993 KIKAI SHINKO, a computer industry monthly, the ATP 
is a cooperative organization consisting of Japanese and foreign 
companies (including Fujitsu) that conduct research with the 
National Institute for Advanced Interdisciplinary Research (NAIR) 
under MITI's Agency of Industrial Science and Technology (AIST). 
The 16 December 1993 NIKKEI SANGYO reports that on 15 December 
Fujitsu won its fourth bid, from the Institute of Physical and 
Chemical Research under the Science and Technology Agency (STA). 
With a bid of "between 1 and 2 billion yen" ($9-18 million), Fujitsu 
won over Hitachi, which sponsored a "CM-5" supercomputer made by 
Thinking Machines, according to NIKKEI SANGYO. 

   Competitors Feel Fujitsu Won by Making Very Low Bids - Following 
its string of winning bids, Fujitsu has become the "object of 
attention," the 7 December 1993 NIKKEI reports.  Although "it 
appears" that Fujitsu won based both in terms of price and system 
capabilities, rival firms believe Fujitsu set its prices at a level 
where "it cannot make a profit" and at which other firms "cannot 
win." 

   Regarding the Tsukuba University bid, in which Fujitsu competed 
against NEC and Canon Supercomputer, which sponsored a Cray 
supercomputer, Canon was judged to have a "small lead" over Fujitsu 
regarding technical considerations and a "large lead" over NEC, 
according to the 7 December 1993 NIKKEI.  However, in terms of 
price, Fujitsu's bid of 2 billion yen ($19 million) was "very much 
lower" than Canon's bid of about 3.5 billion yen ($33.3 million) and 
NEC's bid of 2.6 billion yen ($24.8 million).  Fujitsu claims it won 
the Tsukuba bid based on the performance of its machine, but "there 
are those within the industry" who believe Fujitsu won only because 
it tendered an "extremely low bid," the 30 November NIKKEI notes. 

   Concerning the ATP supercomputer, although nine firms tendered 
bids, Fujitsu won at a price of about 2.8 billion yen ($25.5 
million), according to the 2 December 1993 NIKAAN KOGYO. 
Reportedly, NEC and Hitachi also placed bids "in the 2 billion yen 
($18 million) range."  Cray Research and other "systems integration" 
firms that sponsored Cray products appeared to have bid over 3 
billion yen ($28.5 million), and the highest bid was said to be 4.6 
billion ($43.8 million).  Regarding Fujitsu's bid, however, "there 
are those who believe" that Fujitsu "bid a considerable lower price" 
to win, NIKKAN KOGYO observes. 

   VPP500 Orders Far Fewer Than Fujitsu Anticipated - When Fujitsu 
began marketing the VPP500, it hoped to sell or lease 50 units by 
the end of 1995, according to the 11 September 1992 ASAHI SHIMBUN. 
By the end of 1993, however, Fujitsu has only won seven orders. 

   Regarding the bidding for the eleven supercomputers under the 
FY93 supplemental budget, the 7 December NIKKEI observes, Fujitsu 
expected to win "at least 50 percent of the orders," which would 
mirror its domestic supercomputer market share.  However, even if 
the firm wins the final FY93 supercomputer bidding from the National 
Cancer Center in late February 1994, it will not achieve its sales 
goal. 

   In part, Fujitsu believed it could win 50 percent of the bids 
because three of the institutes were already using Fujitsu 
supercomputers.  According to an article in the September 1993 
ZAIKAI TEMBO, once a government agency has a supercomputer in place, 
the manufacturer "is likely to win any new bids" for upgrades.  In 
fact, the magazine notes, all four supercomputers procured by the 
government under the FY93 regular budget were "upgrades" to existing 
models, and three of those remained with the same manufacturer.  In 
addition, the VPP500 requires the use of a VP supercomputer as a 
"front-end machine," the 16 February 1993 NIKKAN KOGYO notes. 

   Fujitsu officials declared that they would "fight to the death" 
to win the bidding to place supercomputer upgrades at the CRL, the 
National Aerospace Laboratory (NAL), and Power Reactor and Nuclear 
Fuel Development Corp. (PNC), according to the 5 November 1993 
NIKKAN KOGYO.  Both the NAL and the PNC are administered by the STA. 
Although Fujitsu did win its upgrade bid from the CRL, contrary to 
earlier statements Fujitsu reportedly "did not even bid" for the NAL 
and PNC machines, whose contracts were won by Intel and Cray Japan, 
respectively, according to the 29 January NIKKEI SANGYO. 

   Cray Research Wins Secibd Government Supercomputer Bid - On 28 
January the Power Reactor and Nuclear Fuel Development Corp. (PNC), 
which is under the Science and Technology Agency (STA), formally 
announced that the U.S. firm Cray Research won the bidding to 
provide the PNC with a supercomputer.  This is the tenth of eleven 
supercomputers to be procured with funds from the first FY93 
supplemental budget.  Cray will provide its "T3D" massively parallel 
processing supercomputer at a price of about 600 million yen ($5.5 
million). 

   This is Cray's second winning bid.  The first was for a C90 
vector processing supercomputer from the Research Information 
Processing Center under the Agency of Industrial Science and 
Technology (AIST).  However, the most recent order  will be the 
first T3D installed in a "government-related organ."   In both 
cases, Cray was the sole bidder. 

   The final bidding for a supercomputer purchased under FY93 
supplemental budget funding will be held in February 1994 by the 
National Cancer Center.  Of the ten previous bids, Japanese and U.S. 
firms have "split evenly," with five wins each.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 29 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Tokyo Electron To Boost Overseas Procurement of Parts, Materials 
-- Tokyo Electron, a major producer of semiconductor manufacturing 
equipment (SME), is moving to expand overseas procurement of SME 
parts and materials.  Given the high yen exchange rate, the company 
wants to increase overseas procurement to lower manufacturing costs 
and strengthen competitiveness.  The company plans to raise its 
ratio of overseas procurement to about 30 percent from the current 
15 to 20 percent.  To achieve this goal, last October it established 
an "international procurement management office" in its technology 
support center.  The role of the office is to provide the integrated 
management of international procurement efforts and to identify 
suitable parts and materials from overseas and make bulk purchases. 
Formerly, each of Tokyo Electron's major plants, including its three 
subsidiaries in Yamanashi, Kyushu, and Tohoku, managed their own 
overseas parts and materials procurement. 

   Japanese SME manufacturers rely mostly on domestic sources for 
parts and materials.  Even with the high yen, they are not taking 
aggressive countermeasures because many of their products are made 
to order and many companies do not have overseas connections. 
However, now that "SME giant" Tokyo Electron is implementing a 
strategy to expand overseas procurement, other SME companies are 
likely to follow.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 10 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - FEATURE:  Divergent Views Evident 
on Future Fiber Optic Network -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of Posts and 
Telecommunications (MPT) and Nippon Telegraph and Telephone (NTT) 
have independently revealed their visions of Japan's next generation 
fiber optic network and the future multimedia market, according to 
press reports.  In addition, the Telecommunications Council, an MPT 
advisory group, in its final report to be released in March, is 
expected to recommend that the private sector build the fiber optic 
network "with active government support."  As Japan plans for the 
next generation communications market, the struggle to control it 
has become severe between the various players. 

   MPT Minister Issues 'Rosy' Vision Statement - According to the 6 
January ASAHI SHIMBUN evening edition, MPT Minister Takenori Kanzaki 
held a press conference to outline the MPT's "medium to long-term 
vision" for nurturing Japan's information communications industry. 
The vision details MPT's plans to "design a program for building a 
basic communications infrastructure, address the issue of merging 
communications and broadcasting services, promote new businesses, 
and pursue international cooperation in the industry."  The MPT 
minister indicated that the future multimedia market will be worth 
123 trillion yen ($1.2 trillion) and will create 2.4 million jobs, 
according to ASAHI. 

   By issuing its vision statement, the MPT "made the first move in 
its struggle" with the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI) over control of the multimedia industry, according to the 7 
January SANKEI SHIMBUN.  SANKEI notes that the MPT sketched a "rosy 
outlook" for the multimedia industry because "it hopes to use the 
communications industry to lead the Japanese economy out of its 
slump," and also because it wants to confirm as soon as possible 
that it, rather than MITI, is the "superior authoritative body" 
regarding multimedia issues.  The animosity between the two 
ministries over multimedia-related jurisdiction has developed into a 
"battle royal," and the MPT is also working against NTT to "snap up" 
control of the multimedia industry as soon as possible, SANKEI 
notes. 

   According to the 13 December issue of NIKKEI BUSINESS, the MPT 
hopes to use the U.S. information superhighway initiative as a model 
to support its position of requesting public funds to upgrade 
Japan's communications infrastructure as it vies with NTT to plan 
the next generation network.  NIKKEI BUSINESS notes that Japanese 
bureaucrats have reportedly interpreted the U.S. initiative as "the 
U.S. Government taking the lead to build a fiber optic network 
throughout the United States," but have "mistranslated" this 
interpretation into their version of a government-led 
"infrastructure program." 

   NTT Attempting To Carve Out Multimedia Role - On 12 January, NTT 
revealed its plans for Japan's future multimedia market that will 
tie the country together with fiber optic links by the year 2015 at 
an estimated cost of 45 trillion yen ($409 billion), according to 
the 13 January MAINCHI SHIMBUN.  NTT in 1995 will begin providing to 
households on a trial basis various multimedia services, including 
two-way interactive games and cable television (CATV).  By 1997, NTT 
will establish fiber optic networks in Tokyo and the major 
metropolitan regions, and by 2000-2005 it will complete hookups in 
the 12 largest cities and prefectural capitals. 

   NTT is "very conscious" of the MPT's vision, according to 
MAINICHI.  NTT feels that "government support is indispensable" for 
progress within the communications industry, but that the private 
sector should "carve out" the multimedia age.  The government, 
according to NTT, should be limited to addressing regulatory issues 
and nurturing the development of the software industry, MAINICHI 
notes. 

   Prior to its announcement, NTT was approached by U.S. Trade 
Representative Mickey Kantor at an unofficial meeting on 7 January 
with a "strong request" for foreign participation in building 
Japan's next- generation communications network, according to the 8 
January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  At the meeting, the U.S. 
side stated that "the Japanese market will be worth $400 to $500 
billion in the future," and that U.S. companies are hoping to 
participate in NTT's plans, from the initial stage.  NIKKEI adds 
that the U.S. side requested further meetings with NTT in March. 

   Telecommunications Council Backs 'Active Government Support' - 
The 18 January NIKKEI reports that the Telecommunications Council, 
MPT's advisory group, will recommend a joint private-public effort 
to build Japan's next generation fiber optic network because it is 
seeking to match the U.S. approach as defined in the Clinton 
administration's information superhighway initiative.  The Council, 
NIKKEI notes, "is firm" in its belief that "active government 
support is necessary."  It feels that if the private sector is given 
complete responsibility for building the network, it will be more 
interested in profitability, will not build the network as quickly, 
and may not ensure uniform services throughout the country once the 
network is completed.  NIKKEI observes that the council has yet to 
decide the government's contribution toward the estimated 30 to 50 
trillion yen ($272-454 billion) needed to build the network. 

   Private Sector Reactions - The MPT recently interviewed about 350 
"top" people from communications companies and from the "general 
working class," including university professors and heads of local 
governments, on how to build Japan's next- generation network, 
according to the 5 January ASAHI SHIMBUN.  About 50 percent of those 
interviewed agreed that the private sector should take the lead in 
building the fiber optic network, and that companies such as NTT 
should be the "central players" and should be backed by government 
support.  Those interviewed felt that private companies "are closer 
to the consumers" and "will consider economical and practical 
matters" in their plans, ASAHI notes. 

   According to the 21 January NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the private 
sector "feels strongly" that MITI's Machinery and Information 
Industries Bureau and MPT's Telecommunications Bureau, 
Communications Bureau, and Broadcasting Bureau should be merged to 
create an "authoritative body" for the telecommunications and 
multimedia industries.  The general belief within the private 
sector, according to NIKKEI SANGYO, is that it is unnecessary to 
divide multimedia-related issues between the two ministries and that 
discussions on which issues should be handled by which ministry are 
"fruitless" and "far removed" from the actual situation within the 
industry.  Private sector executives believe that a blend of 
"competition-minded" MITI bureaus and "regulations-minded" MPT 
bureaus would form a "fine authoritative body," NIKKEI SANGYO notes. 

   Future Outlook - The 24 January NIKKEI asserts that Japan must be 
facing "critical circumstances" in defining its future fiber optic 
network because the Hiraiwa Commission's final report recommends 
that the Japanese Government "refer to the U.S. inititiative" on 
this issue.  NIKKEI explains that the U.S. information superhighway 
initiative is designed around three information networks--the 
telephone, CATV, and personal computers--and is an "all-industry 
boom."  Japan's future infrastructure, however, is designed only 
around a communications network based on the telephone, because 
"there is no existing market or infrastructure" to support the other 
networks as outlined in the U.S. initiative. 

   NIKKEI notes that for Japan, promoting and nurturing the CATV 
market represents a "shortcut solution" to building its network as 
an "all-industry project," like that described in the U.S. 
intitiative.  Although the MPT considerably relaxed regulations last 
year to stimulate growth in the CATV market, NIKKEI notes, a more 
radical shift in policy is necessary to boost its current 2 to 3 
percent growth rate in Japan to the current U.S. level of 60 
percent. 

   The 13 December NIKKEI BUSINESS states that Japan should learn 
the "economic effects of integrating competitive principles into the 
market" from the United States.  The government should permit 
communications companies to offer broadcasting services and should 
allow active investment by non-broadcasting companies in the "dying 
CATV market" to improve its infrastructure. 

   MELCO, Raytheon To Develop Maritime Communications Systems -- 
Mitsubishi Electric Corp. (MELCO) has reached agreement with 
Raytheon, the U.S. defense equipment manufacturer, to supply 
telephones and transmission control devices for a maritime mobile 
communications system which Raytheon will market when it begins 
offering commercial mobile communications services via satellite 
early next year.  The two companies previously worked together under 
a cooperative agreement involving missile technology.  Raytheon, 
which has been attempting to rapidly shift to commercial activities 
with the end of the Cold War, and MELCO, which is eager to boost 
activities in the United States, met last summer and agreed to 
examine cooperative ventures in commercial markets. 

   MELCO--which will independently begin marketing communications 
terminal unit systems for automobiles in October 1994--teamed up 
with Raytheon, which possesses the technology to build antennas, to 
exploit the maritime communications market because Raytheon's future 
mobile communications service area includes the North American 
continent and areas up to 200 miles offshore.  MELCO has been 
developing the telephones and transmission control devices under an 
18-month exclusive sales rights agreement.  The company forecasts a 
large demand for maritime mobile communications systems because 
there are 35,000 commercial vessels and 20,000 recreational boats 
registered in North America.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 28 Jan 94 
p 10) 

   Mitsui, U.S. Firm Sign Communications Cooperation Agreement -- 
Mitsui &amp; Co. has signed a "strategic cooperation agreement" with 
Network Equipment Technologies (NET), a U.S. communications 
equipment manufacturer, to develop information communications 
products for the Japanese market.  Under the agreement, Mitsui will 
acquire exclusive rights to sell NET equipment in Japan, will 
provide $3 million in research and development funds to NET over a 
3-year period for developing equipment and products for the Japanese 
market, and will assist NET in establishing "technical cooperation 
ties" with other Japanese companies. 

   Mitsui will market LAN (local area network) equipment, which 
utilizes NET's "ATMX" ATM (asynchronous transfer mode) technology, 
through its affiliated information systems building companies, 
including Nihon Unysis.  The company estimates a turnover of 1 
billion yen ($9 million) the first year and 4 billion yen ($36 
million) after three years.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 27 Jan 94 p 
13) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Macroeconomic Control Creates New 
Debt Problems for Enterprises -- The State Council's Research and 
Development Center economist Yang Peixin recently noted that 
although the government's macroeconomic regulation policy has 
achieved initial success in certain areas, there are more debt 
chains among state enterprises than in 1989.  Since the official 
macroeconomic control policy was put into effect in June of 1993, 
the foreign exchange rate has started to stabilize.  Higher interest 
rates have also lead to a 144-billion yuan increase in savings 
deposits between July and October.  Accordingly, the growth of the 
money supply was reduced from 54 to 38.6 percent and the growth of 
banks cash reserves increased from 1 to 10 percent. 

   Despite these positive indicators, the tight money policy has 
created a serious cash shortage problem among enterprises, forcing 
many to reduce or stop production.  The increase in bank deposits 
only added to banks cash reserve and did not filter down to 
enterprises.  Moreover, part of the 150 billion which the central 
bank provided to specialized banks between August and October for 
relending to enterprises also failed to reach its intended targets. 

   Meanwhile, macroeconomic control has caused a new round of debt 
chains, which have already exceeded 600 billion yuan nationally and 
have adversely affected the steel, automobile, machinery, chemical, 
and textile industries.  For example, customers of Luoyang's 21 
enterprises owe the group 1.4 billion yuan, and the group in turn 
owes others 790 million; customers of Jilin Chemical Industry 
Company owe the company 900 million yuan, and the company owes 
others 600 million yuan.  As for steel companies, customers of the 
ten largest steel plants owe the plants 12.4 billion yuan.  Benxi 
Steel Plant could only pay workers one-half of their normal 
salaries, and Anshan Steel owes 1.6 billion in taxes.  In fact, all 
the 12 largest steel plants are faciiig difficulties.  Similarly, 
automobiles and trucks produced at the Second Automobile Plant are 
not being sold.  Yanshan Petrochemical Plant does not have money to 
purchase petroleum because funds were spent on capital construction 
and is forced to cut back on operating funds.  The enterprises that 
suffer the most are those large enterprises with good earnings. 

   According to estimates made by the Deputy Director of the 
People's Bank, Zhou Zhengqin, capital construction projects which 
were completed by 1993 and are ready for production would require a 
minimum 100 billion yuan of initial operating expenses.  In 1992, 
industrial and commercial loans totaled 1.5 trillion yuan.  Since 
industrial production increased by 20 percent in 1993, additional 
loans of 300 billion yuan would be needed.  Furthermore, raw 
materials cost increased by 44.8 percent in 1993 and this would 
require another 600 billion yuan in loans this year.  These three 
items, totaling 1 trillion yuan, are realities the state must face 
up to. 

   Yang believes that digging one hole to fill another and solving 
problems piece meal, such as preventing the raising of private funds 
when banks suffer from cash shortages or collecting money from 
localities and enterprises when the state runs a deficit, are not 
good solutions.  The state should further reform by enlivening state 
enterprises and help develop non-state sector to create more wealth. 
Yang maintains that the central government should adopt a flexible 
and comprehensive macroeconomic policy which will properly regulate 
credit and money supplies.  The state should ensure that price 
reform does not proceed too fast and stable prices are maintained 
for rice, foodstuffs, and fuels.  Macroeconomic regulation should 
also be conducted according to the rules of a market economy. 
Instead of the central government making arbitrary decisions, local 
banks should be permitted to exercise their own judgement in 
granting loans.  (Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO 11 Jan 94 p 4) 

   Pudong To Invest 15 Billion Yuan in Infrastructure in 1994 -- 
Pudong intends to invest 15 billion yuan in its infrastructure in 
1994, according to Shanghai's Deputy Mayor and Pudong New District's 
Management Committee Chief Zhao Qizheng.  In a speech given at a 
bankers association, Zhao noted that Pudong New District also 
invested a total of 15 billion yuan in infrastructure between 1991- 
1993, with 12 billion yuan coming in 1993 alone.  Seventy percent of 
these projects have been completed, with the remainder, including 
certain power and water plants as well as communications 
installations, still under construction.  Although China's current 
regulations prohibit foreign investment in communications, Pudong, 
being a new area which Zhao believes should follow new practices, is 
fighting hard for foreign participation in this sector.  So far, 
companies in Hong Kong, Australia, and Japan have already expressed 
interest.  Because the original ten major construction projects 
failed to meet projected needs, another ten projects are either 
under way or under discussion which includes a second airport for 
Shanghai. 

   As of October 1993, Pudong's GNP increased by 21.6 percent over 
the same period in 1992.  Foreign investment has also increased both 
in number of projects and value.  It is estimated that in 1993 the 
number of total foreign investment projects will reach 1,600. 
Projects in Pudong's Jinqiao Development Zone average $13 million, 
10 times the amount in other areas.  Hong Kong is the largest 
foreign investor in Pudong, with 52 percent; followed by the United 
States, with 13 percent, Taiwan with 12 percent, and Japan with 8 
percent. 

   Shanghai is striving to become the Far East's financial center. 
Among requirements are having sufficient Chinese and foreign banks 
establish branches there, having the banking system connected into 
the international network, and having modern computer hardware and 
software.  Scores of skyscrapers have already been built in Lujiazui 
which will become the heart of the financial center.  (Shanghai WEN 
HUI BAO 11 Dec 93 p 1) 

   Nature of Guangxi's Economic Cooperation Reportedly Changing -- 
Five changes have been observed in Guangxi's economic cooperation 
with the rest of the country, and the region is expected to come 
into the limelight again in the second half of this year.  The five 
changes are:  It has stopped being just a recipient of aid from 
other regions and has begun to offer mutually beneficial 
cooperation, inter-provincial cooperation has evolved to cooperation 
within the macroregion, related development has extended from the 
coastal areas to the hinterland, the focus on real estate has 
shifted to industrial and commercial enterprises, and the focus on 
processing industries has developed to building basic industries. 
Last year, over 2,200 cooperation projects were set up, bringing in 
more than 3.8 billion yuan of investment.   (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN 
SHE 0637 GMT 21 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Nanning Upgrades Transport Infrastructure -- Since its 
designation as a coastal open city in June 1992, Nanning, the 
capital of Guangxi, has been developing its transportation 
facilities in order to become the key transport center of southwest 
China.  According to Mayor Xie Ruxuan, Nanning invested 1.9 billion 
yuan building transportation facilities last year, including three 
bridges, three second-class highways, and three major roads.  An 
airport expansion project is also under way.  Investment in postal 
and telecommunications facilities was 240 million yuan in 1993, and 
all local telephone exchanges have been replaced with program- 
controlled equipment.  The mayor also revealed that the city had 
approved the establishment of more than 200 new foreign-funded 
enterprises and had utilized $90 million of foreign investment. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1220 GMT 30 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Value of Most Agricultural 
Imports, Exports Decrease in 1993 -- According to Customs 
statistics, at the end of October, the value of farm product imports 
and exports was $10.46 billion, a 12.6 percent decrease from the 
same period in 1992; This accounted for 7.2 percent of the total 
value of imports and exports.  The value of exports was $7.6 
billion, a 1.3 percent decrease, and the value of imports was $2.86 
billion, a 33 percent decrease. 

   While some exports declined and some increased, overall imports 
declined.  Exports of corn, sugar, produce, canned food, and tea 
increased 10 to 35 percent.  Rapeseed exports decreased 24.1 
percent.  Imports of wheat, feed, vegetable oil, and timber 
decreased 15 to 40 percent. 

   The proportion of ordinary trade declined.  Barter and processing 
trade rapidly developed. Sugar and canned meat exports changed from 
ordinary trade to barter trade.  Wool imports mainly involved 
processing trade. The value of imports and exports from ordinary 
trade was $7.15 billion.  The proportion of this trade dropped from 
81.4 percent during the same period in 1992 to 68.4 percent. 

   Export markets changed. Exports to East Asia, Southeast Asia and 
the European Community shrank, while exports to the former Soviet 
Union and East Europe grew.  The value of exports to East Asia, and 
Southeast Asia was $4.55 billion, an 8.3 percent decrease. The value 
of exports to the former Soviet Union and East Europe was $930 
million, a 47.5 percent increase, and the value of exports to the 
European Community was $880 million, a 4 percent decrease. 

   Japan was the largest importer of agricultural products.  The 
value of exports to Japan was $1.55 billion, a 3.2 percent decrease. 
Produce, corn, and rapeseeds were the major exports.  The value of 
exports to Hong Kong was $1.4 billion, a 19.1 percent decrease. 
Major exports were hogs and produce.  The value of exports to Russia 
was $800 million, a 62.7 percent increase.  Major exports were 
sugar, corn, and canned meat.  The value of exports to Korea was 
$540 million, a 15.3 percent decrease.  Corn was the major export. 
The value of exports to Germany was $340 million, a 6.8 percent 
decrease. 

   Agricultural imports from Australia, the United States, and 
Canada accounted for 50.4 percent of total imports. The value of 
imports from Australia was $510 million, a 34.4 percent increase. 
Wool was the major import.  The value of American imports was $480 
million, a 46.5 percent decrease.  Wheat was the major import.  The 
value of Canadian imports was $450 million, a 46 percent decrease. 
Wheat was the major import. 

   Major reasons for the trends reported above are: 

   1. Agricultural supplies are abundant because of the success of 
rural economic reform.  The level of dependence on imports has been 
reduced.  Changes in the renminbi exchange rate have caused the cost 
of agricultural imports to increase, which inhibits agricultural 
imports.  Another reason for the decline is that on 1 April 1993 
China abolished import subsidies on farm products. 

   2. Because farm product competition in the international market 
is intense, prices are low.  Although China has increased the 
quantity of agricultural exports, the value has actually decreased. 

   3. Quality is a major reason for the fluctuation of agricultural 
exports.  For example, the proportion of Chinese apples in the Hong 
Kong market has declined from 40 percent to 15 percent because of 
quality problems. Exports are also hindered by the separation of 
production from marketing and strict limits on farm product exports 
by the foreign trade system. 

   4. Because of declining agricultural output in the former Soviet 
Union and East Europe for several years, Chinese farm products have 
entered this market. 

   5. The lifestyle and eating habits of people in East Asia and 
Southeast Asia are similar to those in China, therefore Chinese farm 
products in these markets have expanded.  (Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO- 
PAO 20 Dec 93 p 11) 

   Hong Kong Trade With Mainland Expected To Increase Again in 1994 
-- The Hong Kong Trade Development Council forecasts that Hong 
Kong's foreign trade volume in 1994 will rise 5 percent faster than 
in 1993, reaching a total of 19 percent. The Council indicates that 
this is because its main source of trade is from the Chinese 
mainland.  Stimulated by the thriving trade with the mainland, Hong 
Kong may have exported to China as much as 28 percent of its exports 
in 1993, making the mainland its number one trade partner.  Since 
the mainland economy will continue to grow in 1994, Hong Kong is 
still "very optimistic" about its trade future with China despite 
China's possibly renewed inflation and economic retrenchment 
resulting from its tax decontrol. 

   The Council says that because the continuous opening of the 
Taiwan market to mainland raw materials as well as a relaxed 
restriction on mainland imports,  Hong Kong expects that China will 
have a great increase in imports and a slowdown of growth in exports 
in 1994, thereby narrowing the growing gap between Hong Kong's 
investment in Taiwan and in the mainland.  (Beijing JINGJI RIBAO 3 
Jan 94 p 3) 

   Tianjin Signs Housing, Auto Contracts With Malaysian Firm -- 
Tianjin Municipality signed a housing renovation contract with the 
Golden Lion Group of Malaysia on 4 January.  Tianjin and the Golden 
Lion Group of Malaysia will jointly renovate three tracts of 
condemned houses in Nankai District, covering an area of 270,000 
square meters, and build houses in a area measuring 870,000 square 
meters.  The Malaysian side will invest 2.5 billion yuan Renminbi. 
The Malaysian side also signed an agreement with a Tianjin vehicle 
company to help it transform and expand annual production capacity. 
Based on the agreement, the Malaysian side will invest 2 billion 
yuan Renminbi to help this company produce from 300,000 to 500,000 
tons of cold rolled plates and 2 million radial tires annually. 
Letters of intent were also signed on transforming and expanding the 
facilities of Tianjin Emporium, Dongfang Commercial Building, and 
Tianjin Hotel.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 4 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul Bureau 

   Tianjin Signs Two Construction Contracts With Hong Kong Firm -- 
The Hexi district people's government in Tianjin Municipality and 
Tianjin development zone general company signed two contracts with 
the Juchuan International Group Corporation Limited of Hong Kong on 
10 January.  These contracts include renovation of condemned and 
shabby residential houses in the east Liuzhuang village of Hexi 
district and the construction of a power plant in the development 
zone. The renovation project covers an area of 9.63 hectars, which 
also includes the construction of a small residential district with 
cultural, recreation, business, and trade facilities covering an 
area of 310,000 square meters.  The total investment for this 
project is 1 billion yuan. The power plant construction project 
involves an investment of 1 billion yuan, 250 million yuan of which 
comes from Hong Kong.  (Tianjin TIANJIN RIBAO 11 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul 
Bureau 

   Tianjin Establishes Business Ties With ROK -- By the end of 1993, 
Dongli district in Tianjin Municipality had established 190 types of 
foreign-funded enterprises.  The agreements for these enterprises 
involved $148 million in investments, $101 million of which were 
registered investments.  Of these enterprises, 37 are ROK-funded 
enterprises involving $59.11 million in investments, $53.75 million 
of which are registered investments.  So fare 18 ROK-funded 
enterprises have begun operation and production.  As of the end of 
1993, these Korean enterprises had realized 150 million yuan in 
output value, accounting for 30 percent of the total output value of 
foreign-funded enterprises; realized $28.01 million in foreign 
exchange, accounting for 70 percent; and created 7.89 million yuan 
in profits and taxes, accounting for 16.2 percent of the total 
profits and taxes created by foreign-funded enterprises.  (Tianjin 
TIANJIN RIBAO 16 Jan 94 p 1) Seoul Bureau 

   Heilongjiang Establishes Joint Venture With Japan -- Harbin 
Electric Machinery Company in Heilongjiang Province and Hitachi 
Company of Japan established on 29 January a joint venture to 
develop new technology products in Harbin.  This is China's first 
joint venture to produce new and high-technology power equipment. 
Each side will invest $500,000.  Through the development of new and 
high-technology products, these two companies will jointly open up 
international and domestic markets.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 
GMT 29 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Heilongjiang's Harbin Increases Foreign Investments -- Harbin 
City of Heilongjiang Province has become a hot spot for investment 
by Hong Kong, Taiwan, and ROK businessmen.  Of the present 1,283 
foreign enterprises approved by Harbin city, 80 percent are invested 
in by businessmen from these three places.  In 1993, the city 
approved the establishment of 696 foreign-funded enterprises, 
surpassing the total number of enterprises approved during the past 
nine years.  These enterprises involved a total investment of $1.125 
billion.  Hong Kong and Taiwan ranked first in the number of 
enterprises established and in the amount of investments of the 26 
countries that made investments in Harbin.  Of the 28 newly approved 
projects, each with an investment of more than $100 million, Hong 
Kong invested in 20, Taiwan invested in three, and the ROK invested 
in two.  (Harbin Heilongjiang Radio 1000 GMT 22 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Liaoning Approves 404 Taiwan-Funded Investments in 1993 -- 
Liaoning Province achieved new progress in economic dealings with 
Taiwan in 1993.  It approved 404 Taiwan-funded projects involving 
more than $320 million, which is equal to the total amount made 
during the past 10 years.  (Shenyang Liaoning Radio 2300 GMT 26 Jan 
94) Seoul Bureau 

   Shenyang Foreign Economic, Trade Achievements -- Shenyang City of 
Liaoning Province created $540 million in foreign exchange through 
exports during 1993, up 16.6 percent over the previous year.  It 
signed 33 contracts on construction projects and export of labor 
services in 1993, involving more than $53 million.  Its business 
volume with foreign countries reached more than $38 million. 
(Shenyang Liaoning Radio 1000 GMT 23 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Steel Industry Utilization of Foreign Capital in 1993 -- 
According to a source in the Ministry of Metallurgical Industry, 
China's steel industry utilized $900 million of foreign capital last 
year.  The source said that China had managed to obtain foreign 
loans for the third phase of the Baoshan Iron and Steel Company and 
the Wuhan Iron and Steel Company "Double 700" project, and the 
Anshan Iron and Steel Company's seamless steel pipe project. 
Maanshan Iron and Steel Company, which obtained $500 million in 
funds through listing on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange, became the 
largest Chinese company listed abroad, and collected the greatest 
amount of foreign funds thus far.  In 1993, foreign direct 
investment in China's steel industry increased by $150 million. 
(Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1148 GMT 20 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jiangsu Joint Polyester Project With U.S., Japan -- With State 
Council approval, a Sino-Japanese-U.S. joint venture will invest 
$125 million to start a project to produce 60,000 tonnes of 
polyester annually in Jiangsu's Suzhou.  The project is one of 37 
key projects to be launched in Jiarngsu this year.  These will 
include two power plants, a railroad, an acetic acid plant, and a 
cement plant.  According to an unidentified vice provincial 
governor, Jiangsu will invest 11.6 billion yuan in the 37 projects, 
seven of which have already started.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0901 GMT 21 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Qingdao Bonded Zone Attracts Foreign Investment of $63 Million -- 
By the end of 1993, 77 foreign investment projects from 18 countries 
and regions, worth a total of $63 million, had been established in 
the Qingdao Bonded Zone.  Up to the present, 132 million yuan has 
been invested in infrastructure in this 2.5-square-km area, and a 
total of 172,000 square meters of floor space is under construction. 
According to analysts, Qingdao Bonded Zone owes its popularity among 
foreign investors to the following three factors: more preferential 
policies than special economic zones and economic and technological 
development zones; superior infrastructure for foreign investment 
with advantages in port facilities, roads, electrical supply, ferry 
services, communications, and other commercial and trade facilities; 
and a small but capable management committee.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 0601 GMT 20 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Jiangsu Township Enterprises Increase Production by 58 Percent -- 
Township and town enterprises in Jiangsu Province in 1993 produced a 
total output value of over 400 billion yuan, an increase of 58 
percent over the previous year.  They also paid 19.9 billion yuan of 
profits taxes, a 58.9 percent increase.  Township and town 
enterprises have also become a major force in Jiangsu's foreign 
trade.  In 1993, their exports totaled 56.3 billion yuan, a 57.7 
percent increase over the previous year.  Data also shows that 
township and town enterprises are gradually developing into larger 
enterprise groups.  Last year, 89 provincial-level enterprise groups 
comprised of township and town enterprises were set up.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0501 GMT 22 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Foreign Investment in Fujian in 1993 Exceeds Last 14 Years -- In 
1993, Fujian signed contracts involving foreign investment of $11.2 
billion, exceeding the total amount of foreign capital attracted in 
the last 14 years.  Last year, there were 4,495 foreign-funded 
enterprises, and the amount of foreign capital actually utilized by 
them was $2.5 billion.  Foreign-funded enterprises account for one- 
third of the province's gross industrial output value, and their 
exports account for more than half of the province's total exports. 
In 1993, foreign-invested projects in Fujian, such as infrastructure 
and housing developments, proceeded at a much faster rate than in 
previous years.  These projects utilized foreign capital of $2.8 
billion, 87 percent of the total amount of foreign capital used in 
the last 14 years.  (Fuzhou Fujian People's Radio Network 2300 GMT 
25 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan Corporation Invests in Tianjin -- Hwano Group, a Taiwan- 
based company, is investing in Tianjin, and its total investment 
will exceed $400 million, not including a redevelopment project in 
Tianjin's old city, under which the group will develop 8 million 
square meters of housing.  Hwano has purchased 550,000 square meters 
of land in the Tianjin Development Zone to build a $51-million 
international resort, which will include a golf course, 48 deluxe 
office buildings, a five-star hotel, swimming pools, restaurants, 
and clubs.  In addition, it will invest $200-300 million to build a 
ship-breaking yard in the harbor area.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1052 GMT 26 Jan 1994) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan Invests in Shanghai Industrial Zone -- Huang Mao-hsiong, 
chairman of the Hong Kong Taiwan Chamber of Commerce and president 
of the Chien Lien Investment Company, says that he will establish a 
joint-venture with Shanghai's Chongming Island Company, a real 
estate firm, to develop 30,000-50,000 mu of land in the middle of 
Chongming Island to build residential units, villas, and an 
industrial zone to attract Taiwanese business to invest on the 
island.  Initial development will involve 6,000 mu of land, and work 
will begin shortly after the spring festival.  Taiwan investments at 
present include ship-breaking and garments, but Huang said that 
several large auto parts firms in Taiwan were interested in shifting 
production to Chongming Island.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 
0318 GMT 30 Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Austrian Government Funds Guangxi Water Project -- Guangxi's 
Beihai City will use a loan provided by the Austrian Government to 
build an urban water supply project.  The loan of 46 million 
Austrian Shillings is the first by a foreign government used to 
develop the city's infrastructure.  The Construction Bank of China 
is also providing a 40-million-yuan loan to support facilities for 
the project, which will allow the city to supply 450,000 cubic 
meters of water each day.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0647 GMT 31 
Jan 94) Hong Kong Bureau 

   Taiwan:  Government Moves To Meet U.S. Tariff Demands -- Of the 
699 products on which tariff reduction is demanded by the United 
States, Taiwan has agreed to lower tariffs on over 150 agricultural 
and industrial products, 47 of which will have their tariffs lowered 
roughly 30 percent.  The tariffs on over 100 other items will be 
lowered once Taiwan has revised its tariff regulations.  While 
automobiles are excluded, wood, paper, and some metal products are 
among the 47 items scheduled for tariff reduction.  The other 100 
items on which tariffs will be reduced once Taiwan has revised its 
tariff regulations will include processed food, iron and steel 
products, and household electrical appliances.  The Republic of 
China will increase work on lowering tariffs to meet the U.S. demand 
as soon as possible.  (Taipei CHING-()aHI JIH-PAO 24 Jan p 2) 
Okinawa 
Bureau 

   National CEPD Takes Steps To Facilitate Financial Liberalization 
-- The Council for Economic Planning and Development (CEPD) has 
drawn up a 20-point list of measures to facilitate financial 
liberalization.  CEPD Chairman Hsiao Wan-chang said the move is 
aimed at easing restrictions on foreign banks in establishing 
branches and at accelerating financial liberalization in Taiwan. 
The relevant list includes steps to review the opening of long-term 
foreign exchange businesses, relaxing operating terms for foreign 
exchange brokers, and easing stipulations restricting foreign banks 
from transacting financial business with the PRC.  Hsiao Wan-chang 
pointed out the move would be in line with Taiwan's bid to rejoin 
GATT and with its plan to develop the island into an Asia-Pacific 
business operations center.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 22 Jan 94 p 
2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Singapore To Serve as Model for Financial Liberalization -- The 
CEPD and the Central Bank of China (CBC) have reached a consensus on 
modeling their financial liberalization plan on Singapore by 
establishing a protective system while liberalizing the financial 
control system in order to offset any undesirable impacts the 
liberalization plan may have on local economy and finance.  CEPD 
Chairman Hsiao Wan-chang said as soon as a financial liberalization 
committee is established, relevant personnel will be sent to 
Singapore to study and draw from its experiences in this connection. 
The governor of the CBC also stressed that though financial 
liberalization is inevitable, it should be carried out by gradually 
opening up the financial market and lifting controls on fund 
transfers, otherwise our interests may be jeopardized before we can 
reap its benefits.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO  22 Jan 94 p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   Investment in Mainland Expected To Continue -- Taiwan expects to 
continue its vast amount of mainland-bound capital investment in 
1994 particularly in the areas of inland sales and the service 
industry.  Taiwan also expects to further clarify its cross-Strait 
import processing and compensation situation.  Taiwan's capital 
invested in the mainland last year was estimated to be nearly US $30 
billion. 

   According to an outside study done on behest of Taiwan's 
financial departments, the majority of Taiwan businessmen investing 
on the mainland reports profits.  The study, concluded in 1993, 
indicated that of the 280 Taiwan businesses interviewed in 
Guangdong, Shanghai, and Fujian, 55 percent reported varying 
profits, and 59 percent of Taiwan business owners want to continue 
investment on the mainland.  The survey also indicated that a Taiwan 
entrepreneur would need 56 percent of capital from Taiwan, and 
another 25 percent from the mainland locality in order to set up an 
operation on the mainland.  He would return to Taiwan 52 percent of 
the profit he makes, and save 30 to 40 percent to reinvest on the 
mainland locally. 

   Taiwan has suggested to the mainland that China should attract 
foreign investment on the priority basis in the areas of public 
construction projects and state-owned enterprises under reform.  It 
indicated that in order to get maximum profit returns, Taiwan-funded 
enterprises on the mainland will most likely be in large-scale 
projects in communication, electricity, energy, and transportation. 
(Beijing JINGJI RIBAO 3 Jan 94 p 3) 

   Japanese Investment Decreased 35 Percent in 1993 -- A sharp 
appreciation of the Japanese yen last year did not lead to an 
increase in Japanese investment in Taiwan.  On the contrary, 
Japanese applications for investment or technological cooperation 
markedly declined when compared with previous years.  According to 
the Investment Commission, there were only 88 cases of Japanese 
investment in Taiwan in 1993, totaling $272.51 million, a decrease 
of 35 percent from 1992.  Only 84 Japanese firms entered into 
technological cooperation with Taiwanese counterparts last year, 
down 13 percent as compared with 1992.  Nevertheless, Japan still 
leads foreign nations in investment and technological transfers in 
Taiwan, mainly in electronics, chemicals, transportation, services, 
and base metal manufacturing industries.  An Investment Commission 
official pointed out the decline was largely because of Japan's 
economic recession.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 17 Jan 94 p 9) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   Investments in Southeast Asia Increase 40 Percent in 1993 -- 
Taiwan's foreign investments were concentrated in the United States 
and Southeast Asia in 1993.  Investments in Southeast Asian nations 
totaled $430 million, representing an increase of 40 percent over 
1992 and accounting for 26 percent of Taiwan's total outbound 
investments.  Singapore and Vietnam led that growth with a nearly 7 
percent increase over 1992.  The Investment Commission predicted 
Southeast Asia will continue to be the focal point for Taiwan 
investors.  (Taipei CHING-CHI  JIH-PAO 17 Jan 94 p (3) Okinawa 
Bureau 

   Investment in PRC Goes Mainly to South But Shift Noted -- 
According to statistics released by the Investment Commission, 
Taiwanese investment in the PRC was still concentrated in the 
southern regions in 1993, but there was a gradual shift towards the 
Yangtze River Valley.  Total investment for the period exceeded $1.1 
billion, which almost equaled the 1993 total of inbound investments. 
A breakdown of the figures shows Guangdong Province topped the list 
with 3,053 instances of Taiwan investment valued at $1.04 billion, 
followed by Jiangsu Province with 2,016 instances valued at $830 
million.  Fujian Province claimed third place with 1,528 investments 
totaling $470 million, and Hebei Province came in fourth with 622 
investments totaling $190 million.  As regards cities, Shanghai took 
the lead with 1,046 investments, while Shenzhen and Dongguan came in 
second and third with 743 and 664 investments respectively.  (Taipei 
CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 19 Jan 94 p 6) Okinawa Bureau 

   Kuomintang To Reduce Its Party-Run Investments From Vietnam -- 
Liu Tai-ying, chairman of the Kuomintang-run Business Management 
Committee, disclosed that the party has decided to gradually 
withdraw its business investments from Vietnam and reduce its stakes 
in the Central Trade Development Company--an investment vehicle for 
Kuomintang-run businesses in Vietnam--from the current 75 percent to 
about 20 percent.  An official of the party-run business said the 
party intends to transfer investments to Siberia, Japan, and 
Indonesia.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 19 Jan 94 p 3) Okinawa Bureau 

   New Guidelines on Investment in the PRC Take Effect 20 Jan -- The 
"Guidelines on Screening Applications for Investment and 
Technological Cooperation in the PRC," promulgated by the Ministry 
of Economic Affairs, took effect on 20 January.  Under the 
guidelines, investments in the PRC exceeding $1 million will have to 
be carried out by a subsidiary company from a third region, and the 
investment amount must not exceed 40 percent of the total paid-up 
capital of the company unless it has been resolved otherwise at a 
shareholders' general meeting.  Capital may include cash, machinery 
and equipment, accessories and parts, raw materials, and semi- 
finished products.  The guidelines also cover rules governing 
company listings on PRC stock exchanges and other relevant details. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 21 Jan 94 p 1) Okinawa Bureau 

   Export Orders in 1993 Increase 6.13 Percent; Hong Kong Up by 30 
Percent -- According to statistics released on 20 January by the 
Ministry of Economic Affairs, foreign export orders were valued at 
$85.8 billion in 1993, an increase of 6.13 percent over 1992. 
Orders from Hong Kong increased more than 30 percent, while those 
from Japan and Europe declined by 3.5 percent and 0.26 percent 
respectively.  In terms of industries, last year's top performers 
were information and electronic products, which showed a 7.43 
percent growth, followed by chemicals with a 3.48 percent growth. 
(Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 21 Jan 94 p 2) Okinawa Bureau 

   Foreign Trade Up by 5.5 Percent in 1993 -- According to the 
Executive Yuan's director general of Budget, Accounting, and 
Statistics, Taiwan's foreign trade totaled $162 billion in 1993, 
with exports totaling $84.95 billion and imports $77.08 billion, 
ranking 14th in world trade. Compared with 1992, the island's total 
foreign trade volume rose only 5.5 percent, the lowest in the past 
three years.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 24 Jan 94 p 1) Okinawa 
Bureau 

   Economics Minister on Steps To Increase Accession to GATT -- On 
24 January Minister of Economics Chiang Ping-kun said the ROC will 
increase efforts to initiate tariff concession talks in connection 
with its bid to join the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade 
(GATT).  It will also review automobile tariff adjustments, and will 
consider changing the current commodity tax on petroleum and cement 
by introducing specific duty rates instead of applying ad valorem 
duties on these two items.  It will also abolish the commodity tax 
on domestic-made home electrical appliances, while intensifying 
efforts to avoid damage to domestic industries as a result of 
opening up the market.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 25 Jan 94 p 2) 
Okinawa Bureau 

   NORTH KOREA:  Pyongyang Alcohol Plant Begins Soju Export -- The 
Pyongyang Alcohol Plant has begun exporting its products.  The 
plant's export of local specialties, including Pyongyang soju, has 
attracted "great interest."  To meet the increasing international 
demand, the plant reached its January export production goal ahead 
of schedule, on 20 January.  (Pyongyang Korean Central Broadcasting 
Network 1200 GMT 25 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  KOTRA Expanding, Increasing Support to 
ROK Exporters -- SUMMARY:  The Korea Trade Promotion Corporation 
(KOTRA) is expanding its global reach at the same time it undertakes 
more direct efforts to support South Korea's export industries, 
according to press reports and a KOTRA brochure.  While other 
government-supported agencies face tighter budgets, KOTRA, in 
keeping with the government's new export-oriented policies, will get 
new overseas branches in areas of increased ROK trade activity. 
Information on foreign markets and products obtained from KOTRA's 
far-flung automated data network reportedly is being shared with ROK 
policymakers. 

   KOTRA, which is described in an official brochure as "a non- 
profit government-run organization to promote the expansion of 
Korea's external trade," is embarking on three separate programs 
aimed at improving its support of South Korea's export industries, 
according to Seoul press reports.  One plan calls for providing 
"concentrated support" to 80-100 ROK small and medium businesses 
(SMB's) annually, for a total of 450 companies, between now and 
1998, the 30 December MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) reports.  Companies 
to be sought as beneficiaries include those with (1) fewer than 100 
employees, (2) producing specialized goods, (3) holding patents or 
advanced technology, and (4) start-up enterprises that are 
technology-intensive. 

   According to MKS, the plan calls for using KOTRA's overseas 
offices to conduct market surveys for the selected companies' 
products, sounding out the feasibility of breaking into overseas 
markets, "providing information on competing products," and forming 
connections with foreign importers.  KOTRA reportedly will work with 
the chosen ROK firms to improve the design and packaging of their 
products, while acting as their proxy by making and distributing 
product catalogs, locating and introducing overseas buyers, setting 
up exhibitions, and helping them  "send  market development groups" 
abroad.  The newspaper cites one KOTRA official to the effect that 
the new policy seeks to lessen the risks SMB's take in getting 
started with export sales, and to redress some of their 
"inadequacies" in personnel and experience. 

   Although the plan is reported by MKS as "new," most of the 
support activities the newspaper describes appear as standard policy 
in a 16-page brochure titled "KOTRA 1992," which outlines the 
organization's functions, goals, and activities.  What seems to be 
new in the plan is the decision to single out particular South 
Korean companies for support, as opposed to what appears, according 
to the language of the brochure, to have been a more generic 
approach.  MKS states that the decision to focus on selected 
companies was undertaken "in accordance with the  provisions  of the 
government's New Economic Policy." 

   A second program, reported in the 31 December MKS, involves what 
that newspaper calls a "major expansion" of KOTRA's overseas 
facilities.  Four new offices reportedly will open in Dalian, in one 
other location in the "interior" of China, in Tel Aviv, and in 
Vietnam, in keeping with the "sudden increase" in ROK trade and 
investment in these areas.  According to MKS, KOTRA's expansion of 
its overseas network is "closely connected" to its plan to increase 
support for South Korean SMB's that run up against "barriers" in 
exporting to foreign markets.  Although other ROK Government 
agencies are downsizing, the newspaper states, KOTRA will expand 
into new areas while maintaining its present representation in 
advanced countries "in consideration of their importance and the 
need for a balance between the network of branches in competing 
countries." 

   The "KOTRA 1992" brochure lists 76 overseas "trade centers," 
including 17 in Asia, three in Africa, 25 in Europe, 11 in Latin 
America, eight in the Middle East, nine in North America (two in 
Chicago, and one each in Dallas, Los Angeles, Miami, New York, and 
Washington D.C.), and three in Oceania.  Five more were "to be 
established," according to the brochure, in Ho Chi Minh City, 
Sendai, Shanghai, Vladivostok, and San Francisco for a total of 81, 
the same figure cited in the 22 December MKS.  The four "new" 
offices reported in the 31 December MKS are in addition to that 
number.  Some other changes may also be in the works: while the 
brochure distinguishes the Moscow, New York, Paris, and Tokyo 
offices from the others by accrediting them with resident KOTRA 
vice-presidents, the 22 December MKS reports plans to make Los 
Angeles and Singapore the second and third "core cities" of KOTRA's 
information network after Brussels, indicating a reorganization or 
two separate channels for administration and information. 

   KOTRA's plan to upgrade its gathering, storing, and disseminating 
of trade information constitutes the third major change reported in 
the Seoul press in recent weeks.  According to the 22 December MKS, 
KOTRA is linking all of its overseas trade offices into a 
computerized data system, backed by a database holding trade 
information by country, which offices can access by on-line 
computer.  This report is consistent with the brochure's description 
of a multi-user databank and other on-line LAN (local area network) 
and VAN (value-added network) services "being developed" for 
domestic and international use.  The brochure states, "KOTRA carries 
out comprehensive market research activities to keep abreast of 
rapid changes in global trade, monitoring and analyzing economic and 
business conditions in specific countries and regions throughout the 
world.  On the basis of such information compiled by KOTRA's 
extensive overseas network, trade and investment opportunities are 
disseminated and government-level policy responses are recommended." 

   FEATURE:  Press Reacts to U.S. Court Order Against Iljin -- 
SUMMARY:  A U.S. federal court's ruling against a South Korean 
industrial diamond manufacturer charged with commercial espionage 
has triggered complaints in the ROK press that the firm was 
victimized.  A Seoul business magazine argues that the company's 
informal efforts to acquire U.S. technology are a "universal 
practice," and that the suit was upheld to protect a U.S. monopoly. 
Although "shocked" by the ruling, press articles neither call for 
nor report any move to curtail such practices, but point instead to 
Japan's success in dealing with similar U.S. suits through its own 
legal procedures. 

   According to reports in several ROK newspapers, a U.S. federal 
appeals court on 5 January ordered the South Korean company Iljin to 
suspend its manufacture of industrial diamonds for seven years.  The 
ruling reportedly was issued in response to a suit filed by the U.S. 
firm General Electric (GE), charging that Iljin had illegally 
obtained proprietary technology through a former GE employee. 
Iljin's response to the court order was "We absolutely cannot accept 
the U.S. court's one-sided ruling in favor of GE's claim, which 
comes close to sophistry," the 9 January HANGUK ILBO reports, adding 
that Iljin plans to appeal the ruling. 

   According to HANGUK ILBO, Iljin claims it developed industrial 
diamond manufacturing technology jointly with the Korea Advanced 
Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST) over a three-year 
period, and that GE's suit was merely the "arrogance of a large 
company that wants to monopolize the diamond market."  The 9 January 
CHUNGANG ILBO likewise reports Iljin's assertion that the technology 
was developed in South Korea under contract with KAIST, and that the 
"technological advice" it got from the GE employee was obsolete. 
The Seoul business magazine CHUGAN MAEGYONG on 19 January argues 
similarly that Iljin's diamond technology was co-developed with 
KAIST.  According to the magazine, GE filed the charge "to get rid 
of its competition," and the U.S. court allegedly "ruled that the 
factory be closed so that the (United States) could maintain its 
world monopoly."  Neither the sources cited above nor a related 
YONHAP report filed on 11 January suggest that the ROK company was 
guilty of any wrongdoing. 
   On the contrary, CHUGAN MAEGYONG defends Iljin's efforts to 
acquire GE's technology as a "general practice common in 
international society."  By the  magazine's account, in May 1985 
Iljin and KAIST began a joint program to "indigenize" industrial 
diamonds with a 1.2 billion won ($1.5 million) investment.  South 
Korea at that time reportedly was entirely dependent on foreign 
sources for industrial diamonds, which KAIST considered "critical 
material" for a host of civilian and military applications.  With 
KAIST's support, Iljin allegedly developed its own manufacturing 
technology by 1987, and "on that basis" built a factory in 1989 to 
produce the diamonds.  While the factory was being built, the 
magazine states, Iljin signed a "technical contract" with Sung 
Chien-ming, a China-born industrial diamond specialist who had left 
GE in 1983 to work for Norton, a U.S. competitor in the same field. 
The magazine asserts that Iljin's contract with Sung "followed a 
general principle of civil society which regards technical 
consultations with retired technicians in a given industry as a 
universal practice carried out by all companies in modern industrial 
society." 

   According to CHUGAN MAEGYONG, GE's suit was just one of many 
actions the U.S. company took to preserve its "monopoly" in the 
high-profit industrial diamond market.  GE reportedly bought out all 
other U.S. industrial diamond makers, and prevented them from being 
manufactured in Germany and Japan.  When Iljin was ready to go into 
mass production, the magazine asserts, GE filed suit on the premise 
that production technology which "GE developed and commercialized in 
the 1950's" still belonged to the company, and that even a person 
who had worked for the company a decade ago "and carries the 
company's technology in his head" cannot use it elsewhere.  The 
magazine states that when GE filed suit, it "mobilized" high-ranking 
U.S. Government officials to "pressure" the ROK Government to close 
Iljin.  GE allegedly moved to block the sale of Iljin diamonds in 
domestic and foreign markets, and tried to obstruct Iljin's attempts 
to buy manufacturing equipment, the magazine asserts.  Iljin, a mid- 
size company with sales less than 1/200 that of GE, is said by the 
magazine to have lacked GE's influence, not just in the United 
States but in South Korea.  It could not compete against the 
multinational giant's patent "offensive," especially in a U.S. court 
where "national interests" were at stake. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG observes that previously in cases of alleged 
patent rights violations, the two parties would agree on restitution 
and the matter would end.  What has drawn interest in the present 
case from everyone "here and abroad," according to the magazine, is 
the precedent of a U.S. court ruling on a "civil case" in support of 
U.S. interests.  The order for Iljin to suspend production was thus 
a  severe shock" to ROK manufacturers.  Although the ruling has "no 
force" in South Korea, it does have "political significance."  There 
is also potential for "retaliatory measures from the country 
affected," which could set off an "unwanted trade war." 

   Assessing the immediate fallout, the magazine reports that 
Iljin's U.S. assets will likely be frozen, but that these are small 
and "the damage would not be as bad as expected."  However, the U.S. 
Government "will probably exert diplomatic pressure" and find other 
ways to "browbeat" South Korea, such as banning tools made with 
Iljin diamonds.  Since 30 percent of the ROK's industrial diamond 
needs are supplied by Iljin, suspending production would cause the 
ROK to suffer a loss of $1 million monthly in import savings.  The 
magazine suggests that both governments "positively encourage 
reconciliation between Iljin and GE" and work toward a "satisfactory 
compromise." 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG's four-page report neglects to bring out some 
facts raised in the litigation that show Iljin's position in a less 
favorable light.  Absent from the account is any mention that the 
former GE and Norton employee Sung (AKA Larry King) was paid more 
than $1 million a year from Iljin for handing over materials 
purloined from the two U.S. companies, according to one well- 
documented study (Peter Schweizer, Friendly Spies, The Atlantic 
Monthly Press, N.Y., 1993 pp 176-185).  Nor is there any reference 
in ROK press reports to the main body of evidence on which the case 
was decided, namely, some 14 file cabinets of GE and Norton 
documents seized in Sung's home. 

   ROK press reports, however, do note a difference between the 
Iljin case and Japan's efforts to informally acquire U.S. 
technology.  CHUNGANG ILBO opined that U.S. companies, mindful of 
the Japanese's negotiating abilities regarding intellectual property 
rights, "do not touch Japanese firms lest they be countersued." 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG cites a case where a Japanese court overturned a 
U.S. court's ruling against a Japanese firm charged with stealing 
trade secrets.  Not only is Japan more successful than South Korea 
in defending itself against commercial espionage charges, the 
magazine notes, it does so despite the fact that its motivation for 
obtaining U.S. technology is less urgent.  "If even a 
technologically advanced country like Japan hastens  to learn from 
U.S. technology, then what more can be said about South Korea?" 

   FEATURE:  ROK To Export Nuclear Equipment and Technology -- 
SUMMARY:  South Korea will become involved "full-scale" in the 
export of nuclear power equipment and technology to developing 
countries, according to Seoul press reports.  China and Southeast 
Asia in particular will be targeted because of the rising demand 
there for electrical power.  The ROK is also forming its own 
nuclear power regulatory center" reportedly to "conduct its own 
inspections" to further peaceful use of nuclear power. 

   The Korea Electric Power Corporation (KEPCO) is moving ahead 
full-scale with plans to export nuclear power equipment, the 17 
January MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) reports.  The South Korean 
Government-run corporation recently signed a contract with a Chinese 
nuclear power utility in Guangdong Province for "technical support 
and equipment service."  According to MKS, KEPCO will send 26 
employees in 1994-95 to the PRC nuclear plant as part of a 
comprehensive deal that will involve comparing designs and exporting 
ROK technology and equipment to remodel the installation. 

   KEPCO reportedly has also decided to step up its exports of 
nuclear power equipment and technology to other developing 
countries.  Projects now under consideration include reopening the 
Bataan nuclear plant in the Philippines and constructing a nuclear 
power plant in Akkuyu, Turkey.  The newspaper quotes a KEPCO 
official to the effect that demand for electrical power in China and 
developing Southeast Asian countries has risen rapidly, and the 
corporation is organizing teams to explore how South Korea can tap 
into this market either directly or through international 
cooperation. 

   KEPCO's plans coincide with the ROK Ministry of Science and 
Technology's (MOST's) new export policy reportedly outlined in the 
ministry's annual report to the president.  As reported in the 12 
January MKS, the minister stated that South Korea will "export 
design, construction, and operating technology for research reactors 
and for nuclear power development to the Philippines and other 
Southeast Asian countries."  The paper reports MOST "has also 
decided to set up a new nuclear power regulatory center at the Korea 
Atomic Energy Research Institute to conduct its own inspections 
apart from (pyoldoro) the International Atomic Energy Association's 
(IAEA's) inspections."  The center reportedly is being built "to 
promote confidence and transparency for the peaceful use of nuclear 
power domestically and abroad." 

   FEATURE:  Firms Planning Major Drive into LCD Market -- SUMMARY: 
South Korea's large electronics firms are investing heavily in 
technology and equipment for liquid crystal displays in an effort to 
make the ROK number two in this field after Japan, according to 
press reports.  Hyundai is developing advanced products through its 
U.S. subsidiary, while Samsung benefits from a joint technology 
agreement with a Japanese firm.  Although patents friction has not 
yet developed, the ROK Government expects this to become an issue as 
the product line expands. 

   South Korean electronics companies are investing heavily in thin 
film transistor-liquid crystal displays (TFT-LCD's), with a goal of 
transforming this into the industry's second highest value-added 
product after semiconductors, according to the 5 January MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS).  The newspaper reports that the ROK's three 
major producers--Goldstar Electron, the Samsung Group, and Hyundai 
Electronics--began work on TFT-LCD's only three years ago, but have 
already commercialized a number of high-quality products at the 
super VGA (video graphic array) level.  New assembly lines are being 
built which reportedly will enable South Korea to compete with 
Japan, currently the market leader. 

   MKS reports that Goldstar has become the second company in the 
world to develop a high-resolution 12.3-inch LCD panel.  The company 
plans to invest 500 billion won ($625 million) in new assembly 
lines, which, when completed in May 1995, will annually produce 
500,000 units in sizes ranging from 3 to 12.3-inches.  Tokyo NIKKEI 
MICRODEVICES in November reported that $400 million of that 
investment will be for 10-inch panels.  Both MKS and NIKKEI state 
that Goldstar will spend an additional $250 million by 1997 to raise 
its annual production capacity to 1 million units.  Another 140 
billion won ($175 million) will be invested in R&amp;D to improve 
product quality "beyond that of its Japanese competitors," MKS says. 

   NIKKEI and MKS also report that Hyundai began developing 10.4- 
inch TFT-LCD color panels at its U.S. research subsidiary Image 
Quest Technology in 1992.  It has now finished preparations for 
trial runs at a pilot plant in the United States, and expects to 
begin production in South Korea by 1995, the sources state. 

   According to the 5 January MKS, Samsung is working on a 
"comprehensive plan" to expand its production of TFT-LCD's. 
Different subsidiaries will build different parts, toward a goal of 
completely indigenous" production.  MKS reports the group will 
invest 450 billion won ($562.5 million) in LCD's in 1994.  The 8 
November MKS had stated that Samsung Electron Devices, one of the 
group's subsidiaries, was investing 300 billion won ($375 million) 
to increase LCD producition from 1 million units annually at 
present, to 2 million units by 1994, and 5 million by 2000.  The 5 
January MKS notes that Samsung is already producing small quantities 
of TFT-LCD's on a pilot line for use in its own notebook PC's. 

   The 8 November MKS had reported Samsung Electron Devices would 
"set up a local research institute in Japan to secure LCD 
technology," and would go ahead with arrangements for LCD technology 
transfer from Japanese companies.  On 28 December, the same 
newspaper carried Samsung's 27 December announcement that it had 
formed a "strategic cooperative relationship" with Japan's Toshiba 
to jointly develop integrated circuits for LCD's.  MKS reports that 
Samsung will "merge" its own basic technology with Toshiba's 
production and reliability technology."  The two companies 
reportedly are to cooperate through all stages of development, from 
basic standards through final reliability checks to create a product 
that "stands at the forefront of world technology."  According to 
MKS, Samsung believes the arrangement will further its goal of 
expanding sales in the United States, Europe, and Japan, at the same 
time it helps overcome South Korea's relative "weakness" in non- 
memory semiconductors.  Reporting the same event, Tokyo DENPA on 28 
December noted that work is to begin in the summer of 1994 on chips 
with applications for TFT-LCD's and STN (super twisted nematic) 
LCD's, and that the two companies would also work on standardizing 
pin arrangements, which has been an industry bottleneck. 

   South Korea's move into LCD's is raising concern about the need 
to devise "countermeasures" in anticipation of a foreign "patents 
offensive," the 13 January MKS reports.  Although LCD-related patent 
disputes have not yet been raised, the newspaper expects that will 
change in 1996 when South Korean firms begin mass producing advanced 
devices.  According to the ROK Patents Administration, patents 
applications from foreign countries in this field numbered 862 from 
1976-92, with companies in Switzerland, England, and Germany already 
demanding royalties from South Korea for premium color LCD's, TFT- 
LCD's, and liquid crystal materials.  South Korean companies, for 
their part, have filed 1,350 LCD-related patent applications, but 
most of them have been for black-and-white equipment, which means 
the industry can expect some "hard blows," NKS predicts.  The 
newspaper quotes a Patents Administration official who urges South 
Korean firms to "sign licensing agreements beforehand for techology 
where there is concern over patent infringements to reduce the 
damage to domestic companies." 

   Commenting on South Korea's LCD efforts overall, the 1 December 
SILMUL KYONGJE, a publication of the Korea Institute for Industrial 
Economics and Trade (KIET), notes that the ROK's 1992 LCD production 
amounted to $88 million or just 2 percent of the world market. 
Present investment plans, however, will cause the domestic LCD 
industry to grow on average 51 percent annually between 1994 and 
2001, by which time South Korea will have 14 percent of the world 
market and rank second only to Japan.  KIET estimates the level of 
ROK production technology for LCD's at 90 percent that of Japan, 
although design and basic technology is only about half.  South 
Korean companies have the technology to mass produce TN (twisted 
nematic) LCD's at 90 percent Japan's rate, STN LCD's at 40 percent, 
and TFT-LCD's at slightly less than 70 percent of Japan's rate, 
SILMUL KYONGJE reports. 

   KIET states it would prefer that the various South Korean LCD 
manufacturers "develop components jointly, or form a cooperative 
structure by setting up a joint corporation."  In 1992, domestic 
firms reportedly organized a manufacturer's association that has 
focused its research on displays, which, according to KIET, helped 
reduce "overlapping investment."  Competition between ROK firms, 
however, will continue in KIET's view to stand in the way of joint 
efforts.  NIKKEI MICRODEVICES noted similarly that Samsung's and 
Goldstar's plans to manufacture their own components for TFT panels 
is at odds with the ROK Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy's 
policy of apportioning parts and materials production to small and 
medium businesses.  NIKKEI likewise saw little hope such a 
cooperative policy could succeed. 

   Business Laws Restricts Foreign Investment -- Under current 
business laws, restrictions on 31 categories of businesses are 
impeding the flow of foreign investment.  The 31 categories cover 
businesses in the marine, oil, shipping, aircraft, and mining 
industries.  Among the enterprises presently affected by the 
restrictions are those engaged in deep sea fishing, oil refining, 
sea cargo transport, air cargo equipment leasing, and coal mining. 
In most instances, foreign investment in any venture is limited by 
law to less than 50 percent, and foreigners are not allowed to 
represent businesses in the shipping and airline industries. 
Foreigners must receive approval from the National Assembly if they 
want to own more than 50 percent of a marine or mining business.  An 
unnamed  government official recently stated that, since the 
government is actively promoting "globalization and liberalization," 
contradicting laws and regulations will have to be revised.  (Seoul 
CHUNGANG ILBO 5 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Machine Toolmakers Report Increase in Orders -- Machine 
toolmakers last year received orders totaling $655.5 million, up 
38.9 percent from the previous year, according to statistics 
released by the Trade, Industry, and Energy Ministry.  Domestic 
orders reached $619 million, up 44.1 percent from 1992, while orders 
from abroad amounted to $36.5 million, down 14 percent.  According 
to business sources, domestic machine tool orders this year will 
rise about 30 percent, but orders from abroad will be "lackluster" 
as competition with Japan and Taiwan heats up, given the fact that 
the United States has lifted export "self-regulations" that were 
imposed on Japan and Taiwan.  (Seoul YONHAP 0143 GMT 3 Feb 94) Seoul 
Bureau 

   Increase in Export of Automobile Spare Parts Reported -- 
According to the Korea Industrial Cooperative Association, export of 
automobile spare parts amounted to $640 million in 1993, which is an 
increase of 7 percent compared with 1992.  Export of automobile 
spare parts to North America accounted for 45.4 percent; Asia, 23.2 
percent; Europe, 13.4 percent; Central and South America, 6.1 
percent; the Middle East, 6 percent.  Hyundai and Daewoo exported 
spare parts worth $116.6 million and $69.21 million, respectively. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Jan 94 p 17) Seoul Bureau 

   Anam Electronics Projects Show Increase in Domestic Sales -- Anam 
Electronics Co. projects domestic sales of audio and video equipment 
this year at $312.5 million, up 19 percent from last year.  Exports 
are projected at $62.5 million, up 31.5 percent.  Anam said it has 
drawn up an "aggressive business strategy" to improve the management 
of its agencies and prepare for the opening of the electronics 
market.  Sales projections include $182.6 million for color 
televisions, up 17 percent; $106.3 million for audio equipment, up 
23 percent; and $23.8 million for video cassette recorders, up 26 
percent.  (Seoul YONHAP 0237 GMT 20 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Kyongin Promotes Globalization Strategy -- Kyongin Corporation, a 
medium-size dyestuff company, is promoting a global management 
strategy by establishing a production base in Indonesia and a sales 
headquarters in Thailand.  Kyongin is also setting up a new product 
development center in the ROK.  The corporation invested an 
additional $7 million to expand its Indonesian plant and acquired a 
local trading company in Thailand for sales in Southeast Asia. 
Kyongin's Inchon plant will concentrate on the development of new 
products.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Jan 94 p 13) Seoul Bureau 

   Dongyang Exports Steel to Asian Markets -- Last year, Dongyang 
Steel Pipe Co. shipped $10 million worth of steel pipe to China, 
Vietnam, Thailand, Hong Kong, and other Asian markets.  Korean 
steel-pipe makers have been manufacturing mainly small-caliber 
pipes, but Dongyang has shifted its production to large-caliber 
pipes and will continue to focus on large bores, with projected 
shipments worth $20 million in 1994.  (Seoul YONHAP 0224 GMT 24 Jan 
94) Seoul Bureau 

   Hanil Plans To Build Textile Plant in China -- Hanil Synthetic 
Fiber Co. has signed a contract with China to set up a textile plant 
in Shandong Province.  It will invest approximately $12 million in 
the plant's construction.  The plant will begin operation late this 
year and will produce 4,000 tons of spun silk annually.  Seventy 
percent of its output will be exported and the remaining 30 percent 
will be sold domestically.  Hanil plans to send 17 employees, 
including nine technicians, to China and will transfer its 
technology on plant operations to the new plant.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 27 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau 

   Samik Musical Instruments To Expand Indonesian Plant -- Samik 
Musical Instruments plans to promote its plant in Indonesia--the PT 
Samik Indonesia plant--as the largest production base of string 
instruments in the world.  Since October 1993, PT Samik Indonesia, 
which had been operating as a piano spare parts plant, has invested 
an additional $28 million to establish a large-scale facility to 
produce string instruments.  Late last year, the Indonesian plant 
produced 6,000 guitars a month for export.  It is planning to 
increase its production to 10,000 guitars a month by April and to 
20,000-25,000 guitars a month by next year.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 24 Jan 94 p 17) Seoul Bureau 

   Hyundai To Install Crude Oil, Gas Production Equipment in India 
-- Hyundai Heavy Industries has agreed to install ultra large-scale 
crude oil and gas production equipment worth $1 billion for an 
Indian state-owned  oil company.  An installation team left for 
India on 20 January.  The equipment will be installed by mid-May, 45 
km southwest of Bombay.  The equipment will allow daily production 
of 130,000 barrels of crude oil or 2.6 million cubic meters of gas. 
(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 21 Jan 94 p 10) Seoul Bureau 

   Hansol Paper Company To Build Plant in Malaysia -- Hansol Paper 
Co. will build a 250,0O0-ton-a-year newsprint plant in Malaysia in a 
$200-million joint venture with Malaysia's Genting Sanyen Co. 
Hansol will be responsible for engineering, technical training, and 
inspection.  Construction will start in the latter part of the year, 
and the plant is scheduled to go into operation in early 1996. 
Hansol plans to supply 50 percent of the total output of the joint- 
venture plant to Korea and to Southeast Asian markets.  (Seoul 
YONHAP 0239 GMT 21 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Kia To Produce Car Equipment Jointly With Foreign Partners -- Kia 
Group has established a joint venture company with the German 
company Boshe to produce electric accessories equipment, including 
electronic control devices for automobiles.  Kia plans to invest up 
to $10 billion, with Boshe holding a 40-percent share in the 
project. 

   Kia Electronics also concluded a technological and capital 
cooperation agreement with Japan's Alpine Co. to develop audio 
equipment for cars. Alpine will own 7.5 percent of the project. 

   Kia Automobile and Kia Precision Equipment, each holding a 30- 
percent share, recently established the Korea AB System Company, 
with the U.S. ITT Company to develop safety devices, such as a 
device to prevent brakes from malfunctioning and a traction control 
system.  The new company has $6 million in capital.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Jan 94 p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Business Corporations Increasing U.S., Canadian Investment -- 
Several major business corporations are increasing their investment 
to pursue continuous market growth in the United States and Canada 
as the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) goes into effect. 
Taenong is building a cotton spinning plant with 30,000-50,000 
spindles in Louisiana, and Kabul is moving ahead with the 
construction of a modern spinning and dyeing plant in Alabama, 
investing $20-30 million.  Samsung Electronics is planning to invest 
$40 million for a television parts plant in Mexico, which will begin 
operation in 1997.  Hyundai Motor Co. is expanding its plant in 
Canada to increase its annual production facilities of the Elantra 
model to 100,000 cars by 1995.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 2 Feb 94 
p 11) Seoul Bureau 

   Samsung To Build Oil Tankers for Greek Company -- Samsung Heavy 
Industries Co. has obtained an order from Henamaris Ship Management 
Co. of Greece to build two 148,000-ton oil tankers worth $120 
million.  Under the contract signed in Athens on 20 January, Samsung 
will deliver the tankers in 1996.  Tide contract contains an option 
under which Samsung will receive an order for another tanker. 
(Seoul YONHAP 0239 GMT 21 Jan 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Pungsan To Supply Copper Pipes to Saudi Arabia -- Pungsan Co. 
will supply 12,000 tons of white copper pipes and white copper 
plates to be used in a $197-million lake project in Saudi Arabia. 
Pungsan signed a $65-million supply contract with Korea Heavy 
Industries Co. which received the initial orders for the project. 
Shipment of the copper pipes will begin in April and last until 
October 1995.  (Seoul YONHAP 0143 GMT 3 Feb 94) Seoul Bureau 

   Hyundai Motors To Break Ground for Malaysian Plant -- Under an 
agreement signed on 27 November 1993, Hyundai Motors has  applied to 
the Bank of Korea for an initial investment of $8.6 million. 
Hyundai will break ground for its plant in Malaysia in March.  The 
plant will be completed in September 1995 and will have an annual 
production capacity of 10,000 cars.  Hyundai owns 30 percent of the 
joint venture which has a paid-in capital of $90 million.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 29 Jan 94 p 9) Seoul Bureau 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  Thai Firm To Build Dams, Roads, Port in 
Burma -- ONK Mining and Construction Co. plans to build two 
hydroelectric dams, roads, and a port in Burma at a cost of $700 
million.  Construction of the dams, expected to last six to eight 
years, will be at Nam Ruak and Nam Kok in the Shan State.  Annual 
output is estimated at 25 mw and 100 mw, respectively.  Burma will 
buy 10 percent of the electricity output and the rest will be sold 
to Thailand's Electricity Generating Authority. 

   ONK will also build a 350-km, $1.8-million road from Mong Yai to 
Kengtung in the Shan State.  Construction will take three to four 
years.  In addition, the company plans to build an $800-million 
commercial port at Thilawa, 65 km from Rangoon.  (Bangkok THE NATION 
24 Jan 94 p B1) Bangkok Bureau 

   INDONESIA:  New Incentives for Oil Exploration Announced -- 
Indonesia has announced new incentives for oil exploration in its 
eastern region, and in remote and high-risk areas.  The 1994 oil/gas 
incentive package will give investors a more favorable share of 
production, going from the previous 80:20 ratio to a 65:35 ratio. 
Indonesia hopes the new incentives will attract more investors and 
delay the need to import oil until at least 2010.  Without new 
discoveries, the government said, it may have to import oil around 
the year 2000. 

   Faisal Abda'oe, president of the  tate-owned oil company 
Pertamina, said incentives will be granted to oil contractors 
operating in East Indonesia--except for Seram Island (Maluku) and 
the Salawati and Bintulu (Irian Jaya) oil basins.  Incentives will 
also be awarded to oil prospectors in Sumatra's western offshore 
area, Java's southern offshore area, West Kalimantan, Central 
Kalimantan, and some basins of Sumatra, as well as in any offshore 
area that is over 200 meters deep.  (Jakarta SUARA PEMBARUAN 4 Jan 
94 p 4) 

   Transportation, Energy Budget for 1994-95 Reported -- The 
transportation and energy sectors have been designated priority 
items in President Suharto's $33-billion state budget for 1994-95. 
Most of the $2.6-billion transportation budget will go toward road 
construction, mainly outside Java, while rural electrification will 
receive the largest  portion of the $1.75 billion appropriated for 
energy.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 6 Jan 94 p 2) 

   Ministry Issues Jakarta Minimum Wage Decree -- The Manpower 
Ministry has issued a decree stating that effective 1 January, 
workers in Jakarta will receive a 26-percent minimum wage increase. 
The decree stipulates that workers on a monthly-wage system are to 
get a minimum of $56 per month, while the minimum hourly wage is set 
at $2.  Incentive pay, overtime pay, and allowances are not covered 
under these guidelines.  Jakarta Deputy Governor Museno said the 
city administrration will take "firm action" against companies or 
employers who violate the decree.  Museno noted that approximately 
20 percent of the 24,000 enterprises in Jakarta have been paying 
their workers less than the minimum wage.  (Jakarta SUARA KARYA 3 
Jan 94 p 5) 

   MALAYSIA:  Second National Car To Be Introduced in 1994 -- 
Malaysia's second automobile company Perodua, a joint venture with 
Japan's Daihatsu Motor Company Ltd., plans to roll out 20,000 
"Kancil" cars in 1994, its first year of operation.  Perodua's 
Managing Director Ho Tet Kheong said that the cars, aimed at the 
growing middle class and increasingly affluent workers, will be 
built at a new plant 18 miles north of Kuala Lumpur.  Ho added that 
the plant has the capacity to eventually manufacture 45,000 cars 
annually.  Perodua plans to produce a basic model  and a deluxe 
model, priced between $8,800 and $10,000.  The company has no 
immediate plans to export its cars, but may do so in the future. 
(Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 28 Dec 93 p 10) 

   Joint Venture Company To Establish Third LNG Plant -- A recent 
gas discovery off the Sarawak coast by Occidental Petroleum 
Corporation will pave the way for the establishment of a third 
liquefied natural gas (LNG) plant, according to Tan Sri Azizan 
Zainul Abidin, president and chief executive of Malaysia's state- 
owned oil company Petronas.  Occidental made its fifth major gas 
discovery in Block SK-8, bringing the estimated combined discoveries 
in the area to more than 6 trillion cubic feet.  Although details of 
the project remain to be worked out, Azizan said that Petronas is 
expected to have 70 percent in equity in the joint venture, while 
Occidental Petroleum and Nippon Oil if Japan will share the 
remainder.  (Kuala Lumpur WATAN 4 Jan 94 p 13) 

   Small, Medium-Size Industries To Acquire Russian Technology -- 
Anuar Mohd Nor, executive officer of the Malaysian Institute for the 
Advancement of Technology, recently stated that the institute will 
serve as an intermediary for small and medium-size industries to 
acquire Russian technology.  Anuar said that Malaysia can make use 
of Russian technology in its ship repair, rubber, and chemical 
industries.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 3 Jan 94 p 8) 

   Company Receives Orders for Amphibious Aircraft -- Dornier 
Seastar Malaysia has recently received orders from Equalstar Company 
and International Business Consultants (IBC) for five amphibious 
aircraft.  Equalstar will use three of the aircraft for its 
operations in the Pacific Islands and Papua New Guinea, while IBC 
will use the other two in Indonesia.  To date, Dornier has received 
orders for 25 aircraft from nine parties.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS 
TIMES 22 Jan 94 p 4) Bangkok Bureau 

   LAOS:  Germany To Give Aid for Telecommunications, Agriculture 
Projects -- Germany will provide $14.7 million in assistance to Laos 
for a telecommunications project, a public works project, and 
agricultural promotion.  The projects are expected to be carried out 
over a two-year period.  (Vientiane Vitthayou Hengsat Radio Network 
1200 GMT 23 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 
   PHILIPPINES:  Customs Computerizes Procedures at Ports, Airport 
-- The Philippines' customs authorities have begun computerizing 
cargo clearance procedures at Manila, Batangas, Cebu, and Mactan 
Ports, and Manila International Airport.  The project, funded by a 
$27.4-million World Bank loan, will be completed at the end of the 
year.  An electronic mail system linking port authorities, and 
domestic and foreign shipping companies are already in operation. 
According to the customs commissioner, the computerized system will 
standardize procedures, curb pilferage, and reduce processing time 
from two days to two minutes.  (Manila BALITA 4 Jan 94 p 2) 

   BOI Says 1993 Investments Below Target -- The Board of 
Investments (BOI) reports that 1993 investments totaled $3.8 
billion, falling $200 million short of the $4-billion target.  Local 
investments surpassed foreign investments, with the largest projects 
concentrated in the construction industry.  Japan remained the top 
investor, followed by the United States, the Netherlands, South 
Korea, Singapore, and Germany.  (Manila PHILIPPINE DAILY INOUIRER 20 
Jan 94 p 15) Bangkok Bureau 

   Petrochemical Project Approved -- The Board of Investments has 
approved the $357-million petrochemical project proposed by JG 
Summit Holdings Inc.  The venture will produce both polypropylene 
and polyethylene resin at an annual capacity of 300.000 metric tons. 
(Manila PHILIPPINE DAILY INQUIRER 22 Jan 94 p 17) Bangkok Bureau 

   Phone Pact With France Signed -- The Philippine Government has 
signed a $12.8-million, 16-month contract with France to install 82 
public-phone offices in Southern Leyte, Western Samar, Albay, 
Camarines Norte, Sorsogon, and Biliran.  The project will be 
financed with a $10.6-million loan from France, and the Philippines 
will provide the remaining $2.2 million.  (Quezon City MALAYA 22 Jan 
94 p 11) Bangkok Bureau 

   SINGAPORE:  LPG Storage Terminal Established in PRC -- Singapore- 
based oil trading firm Vitol Asia, Hong Kong-based Fortune Oil, and 
Guangdong Province's Zhanjiang Gas Works Development Company have 
built a $13-million storage terminal for liquefied petroleum gas 
(LPG) in Guangdong.  The terminal will be used to store and 
distribute LPG on Hainan Island, in the Zhanjiang economic zone, 
Guangxi Province, and Western Guangdong Province.  Vitol has a 22.5- 
percent share in the project, while Fortune and Zhanjiang Gas Works 
have 27.5 percent and 50 percent, respectively.  (Singapore BUSINESS 
TIMES 28 Jan 94 p 5) Bangkok Bureau 

   THAILAND:  Government Reports Rise in Deficit -- The Thai 
Government has reported a $1.1-billion deficit in the first quarter 
of the 1993-94 fiscal year, a 50-percent increase over the same 
period in the previous year.  Bank of Thailand spokesman Phisit Li- 
atham attributed the higher deficit to increased expenditure and 
investment budgets.  He also pointed out that revenue collection had 
registered a 14.9-increase.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 22 Jan p 22) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Plan To Build Power Plant in Rayong Announced -- The Thai energy 
group Ban-Pu Coal has announced it will build an $800-million, 
large-scale power plant in Rayong, fueled by imported coal.  The 
plant will have a generating capacity of 1,000 mw.  (Bangkok BANGKOK 
POST 25 Jan 94 p B24) Bangkok Bureau 

   Firm Signs Telecommunications Agreement With Laos -- Chinnawat 
Inter Co. Chairman Phaibun Limpaphayom announced recently that the 
company has signed an agreement with Laos to establish a $60-million 
company named Lao Chinnawat Telecom to operate telecommunications 
services in Laos.  Chinnawat will have 70 percent in equity in the 
company, and Laos 30 percent.  The company will have a 15-year 
concession to operate telecommunications services, including 
cellular mobile phones, and to expand domestic and international 
phone services.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 28 Jan 94 p 21) Bangkok 
Bureau 

   Bank Reviews Trade Volume With Indochina -- The Thai Farmers Bank 
recently reported that trade volume between Thailand and the 
Indochinese countries during January to September 1993 totaled $520 
million, a 60-percent increase over the same period in 1992. 
Thailand exported $320 million worth of goods to Laos, Vietnam, and 
Cambodia, and registered a trade surplus of $112 million from 
Indochina.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 31 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Increase in Investment Applications in 1993 Reported -- The Board 
of Investments (BOI) recently reported a threefold increase in 
investment applications in 1993.  Most of the applications involve 
infrastructural projects, and agro-industry and farm products. 
Nearly 70 percent of the applications called for investment outlays 
in the $1-$20 million range, twice the percentage of the previous 
year.  Thirty-four applications required more than $40 million in 
investment, among which were a steel project submitted by NTS Steel 
Group, a pulp project submitted by Advance Agro Co., and a satellite 
service project proposed by Chinnawat Group. 

   Although investment capital dropped by 24.6 percent from the 
previous year, the BOI said that if projects involving $400 million 
or more were excluded from last year's calculations, foreign capital 
would register a 93-percent increase.  Japan remained the leading 
foreign investor in terms of size and number of projects, followed 
by the United States and Taiwan.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 29 Jan 94 p 
22) Bangkok Bureau 

   Increase in Car, Parts Exports Noted -- Suraphong 
Phaisitphathanaphong, spokesman for the Federation of Thai 
Industries' Automobile Industry Club, recently said that automobile 
and parts exports doubled in 1993 compared with the previous year. 
Car exports rose by 5,141 units to 10,049 units, a 104.7-percent 
increase, while exports of car parts, including engines, were worth 
$28 million.  The total export value of cars and parts was $125 
million, a 142.6-percent increase.    (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 28 Jan 
94 p 30) Bangkok Bureau 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Investment Lagging in Central Vietnam -- 
SUMMARY:  Recent statistics show that investment in Central Vietnam 
is lagging.  According to two economic publications, the current 
situation is caused by a lack of policy, state support, local 
expertise, and proper planning. 

   According to the 2-8 December Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE 
SAIGON (TBKTS), to date Central Vietnam has obtained only 53 
investment projects capitalized $249 million, out of 730 projects 
nationwide, capitalized at $6.5 billion.  The 21-27 October Hanoi 
THUONG MAI (TM) reports that nine licenses have been revoked, 
leaving a total of 45 licensed projects for the central region.  The 
magazine notes that only a few projects are operating, most at the 
preliminary stage. 

   Both publications assert that although Central Vietnam has a 
wealth of natural resources--including oil, gas deposits, various 
mineral ores, and marine products--its people are living in poverty. 
TBKTS states that there has been little change in the region since 
the promulgation of the Foreign Investment Law.  It also says that 
foreign revenue is still scarce, with most of it coming from foreign 
aid and "scavenging" activities, such as picking up wartime scrap 
metal, or collecting sand and gravel.  The 1993 Autumn Trade Fair in 
Da Nang showed evidence of stagnant local industries, with "backward 
plants" producing low-quality goods, the magazine remarks. 
TM notes that the State does not yet have an adequate policy for 
investment in Central Vietnam and has not encouraged domestic 
investment. 

   TBKTS quotes Dong Van Tien, the director of the regional Chamber 
of Commerce and Industry, listing the following characteristics 
regarding investment in Central Vietnam: "chaotic investment" 
without proper planning; a desire to work only with foreign 
partners; and a lack of up-to-date information, resulting in the 
purchase of "obsolete machinery" at "inflated prices." 

   According to TBKTSG, many businessmen feel that Central Vietnam 
has been slow to attract foreign investment because of its "weak" 
infrastructure, "poorly prepared" projects, lack of expertise among 
local cadres, and unstandardized regulations.  The lack of qualified 
personnel is the "most important factor," according to TBKTS.  This 
includes those who draw up projects, investment partners, managers, 
and local administrators.  In many provinces in the central region, 
there is not a single foreign trade cadre, TBKTS notes, adding that 
education cadres and office workers with no foreign language skills 
have been appointed to leadership positions in the investment field. 

   Nguyen Van Viet, a specialist who reviews draft projects for the 
State Committee for Cooperation and Investment (SCCI), is quoted by 
TBKTS as saying that there is "a world of difference" between the 
Foreign Investment Law's original intent and its actual 
implementation in many localities.  TM points out that more support 
from the State and more cooperation from domestic and foreign 
investors are needed to help develop Central Vietnam.  TBKTS notes 
that there is a great need to train cadres in foreign investment and 
trade, and to retrain government workers in the administrative, tax, 
and other services.  The magazine also calls for the  State to come 
up with a policy promoting developmeddt of the region. 

   Manufacturers Reluctant To Invest in Equipment, Facilities -- 
While smuggled consumer goods flood the market and imports compete 
with goods manufactured domestically, Vietnamese manufacturers are 
reluctant to invest in new equipment in order to boost quality and 
cut costs. 

   The Dien Quang Lighting Company had taken a $1.6-million loan to 
install a new production line in order to increase its manufacturing 
capacity.  Subsequently, the company's sales stalled because 
imported fluorescent tubes flooded the market following a 
government-mandated cut in import duties.  The director of Dien 
Quang claims that enterprises are reluctant to invest in production 
facilities because government policies do not encourage such 
investments. 

   Private firms in Tan Binh and Phu Binh in Ho Chi Minh City, which 
invested millions in high-pressure textile dyeing equipment from 
Taiwan, currently face losses because of a flood of textile imports. 
Many poly- bag makers are also suffering "heavy losses" because 
competition has cut sale prices to or below cost.  Some firms are 
trying to sell their equipment at half price.  Others have refused 
to buy new equipment under a favorable repayment plan. 

   Domestic plastics firms are also not investing because they are 
facing stiff competition from price-cutting foreign firms and do not 
want to take more risks.  (Ho Chi Minh City TUOI TRE 11 Nov 93 p 3) 

   'Record Turnover' for Hanoi's Industrial Sector Reported -- In 
1993, Hanoi's local industrial sector achieved a "record turnover" 
of $16 million, a 40-percent increase over the previous year.  The 
increase is attributed to a boom in production and export 
activities.  Exports accounted for nearly 44 percent of the 
turnover.  Consumer goods made up a large part of the total 
production.  The city's industrial siector remitted $2.8 million to 
the State, a 42.3-percent increase oNjer the previous year.  (Hanoi 
VNA 0604 GMT 25 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Light Industry Export Figures for 1993 Reported -- In 1993, the 
light industry sector registered a total export value of $350 
million, of which textile and garment products exported to EU 
countries accounted for nearly $300 million.  (Hanoi Voice of 
Vietnam 1100 GMT 25 Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Contract Signed With Hong Kong To Build Commercial Center -- The 
Ben Thanh Tourist Service of Ho Chi Minh City and the Hong Kong- 
based New Vietnam Development and Investment Company have signed a 
joint-venture contract to build a commercial center at a cost of $45 
million.  The project, the biggest of its kind in Vietnam, will be 
located in Ho Chi Minh City's 1st District.  (Hanoi VNA 1337 GMT 22 
Jan 94) Bangkok Bureau 

   Increase in 1993 Agricultural Output Reported -- Agricultural 
output in 1993 totaled nearly $64 million, or 14 percent more than 
the previous year.  Food processing alone achieved $53.2 million, 
surpassing the yearly plan by 10 percent.  The total agricultural 
export-import value was $351.8 million--$235.7 million for exports 
and $116.1 million for imports.  (Hanoi VNA 1425 GMT 23 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Joint Venture Producing Phone Cables -- Vina-Daesung, a $4- 
million venture between the Vietnam Post and Telecommunications 
Company and South Korea's Daesung Electric Wire Ltd. is in 
operation, producing telephone cables of high standard for domestic 
and foreign consumption.  The Vietnamese company's share in the 
venture is 44.2 percent.  (Hanoi VNA 0624 GMT 29 Jan 94) Bangkok 
Bureau 

   Hanoi Nonstate Economic Sector Registers Increase in 1993 -- For 
1993, the Hanoi nonstate economic sector earned $38.1 million, up 80 
percent over the previous year, according to statistics released by 
the Hanoi Commerce and Industry Service.  (Hanoi VNA 0647 30 Jan 94) 
Bangkok Bureau 

   Saigon, Haiphong Ports Improve Handling Capacity -- In 1993, 
Saigon Port and Haiphong Port modernized their facilities, using 
foreign loans totaling $76 million.  Both ports hope to triple their 
handling capacity by the year 2000.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1430 
GMT 1 Feb 94) Bangkok Bureau 

EAG/9FEB94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/jf 10/0546Z FEB 

